




Dennis R. Secor - Executive Vice President, Chief Financial Officer & Treasurer at Fossil Group, Inc.



























































                      NEWS HOME
                    

Advertising
Board and Executive Moves
Energy
Health Care
Hedge Funds
M & A
Private Equity
Technology








            You have  
            
9 free profiles

              left this month   
			      

                Start Your Free Trial ➤
              








            Hey, we noticed you're a RelSci Pro subscriber! Would you like to view the page there?
            

                View on RelSci Pro ➤
              




























































































































Email







LinkedIn







Facebook







Google+







Tweet







Reddit





Permalink





Dennis R. Secor
Executive Vice President, Chief Financial Officer & Treasurer at Fossil Group, Inc.



Overview
In The News Relationships Paths
Education Career History Public Holdings Awards & Honors 


Dennis R. Secor
Executive Vice President, Chief Financial Officer & Treasurer at Fossil Group, Inc.



 Overview



Age



54
                                  (Born 1963)
                                              




Notable Companies


Fossil Group, Inc.

Guess?, Inc.




Awards



1





Number of Relationships



                This person is connected to 900 people.
              






 In The News
          See more




The Dallas Morning News
August 10, 2016





                        Fossil's profit sinks but beats expectations                    





Quartz
November 14, 2015





                        Wearables wrecked Fossil’s earnings, so it bought a wearables company                    





The Dallas Morning News
November 13, 2015





                        Wearables wear down Fossil's net                    





The Dallas Morning News
July 14, 2015





                        Dollar domination                    





The Dallas Morning News
March 6, 2015





                        Watch for Fossil's new wearable tech                    







 Relationships
              See Details




Kosta N. Kartsotis

Chief Executive Officer at Fossil Group, Inc.




Mark D. Quick

Former Vice Chairman at Fossil Group, Inc.





John A. White

Chief Operating Officer & Executive Vice President at Fossil Group, Inc.




Christopher King

Chief Compliance Officer at Fossil Group, Inc.





Janiece Evans-Page

Head of Global Giving & Fossil Foundation at Fossil Group, Inc.




Carmen Keys-Lamb

Senior Account Executive at Fossil Group, Inc.





Sheri Brownshadel

Partner at Fossil Group, Inc.




Sonja Driscoll

General Manager at Fossil Group, Inc.





Maurice Marciano

Co-Founder at Guess?, Inc.




Paul Marciano

Co-Founder at Guess?, Inc.







See 890 more listings with RelSci Professional.

Start My Free Trial ➤








See 890 More 


 


 Paths to Dennis R. Secor



            Dennis R. Secor          




 You



 Connections via Relationship Science



 Dennis R. Secor






Sync your contacts to see how you can connect with Dennis R. Secor.

Start My Free Trial ➤








See  More 


 


 Educational Background



Bachelor's Degree in Accounting 


University of San Diego

                  The University of San Diego (USD) is a private Roman Catholic university in San Diego, California. The university offers 40 baccalaureate degrees, and several degrees in law, nursing, (masters, PhD, and DNP),and other doctorate programs. The university comprises seven different academic colleges.                





 Career History



Executive Vice President, Chief Financial Officer & Treasurer

                                    2012 - Current                


Fossil Group, Inc.


                  Fossil is a global retailer specializing in the design, innovation, and marketing of fashion lifestyle and accessory products. At the heart of the Company’s vision is a commitment to fostering creativity and delivering the best in design through its two core businesses: Fossil brand; and a multi-brand watch business.

The Fossil brand is rooted in authenticity and a distinctive vintage-inspired design aesthetic. With over 390 stores worldwide and a strong global e-commerce business, the brand is internationally known for its eclectic assortment of lifestyle and accessory items including watches, handbags, and clothing.

The Company also creates fashion accessories for a number of other owned and licensed brands including MICHELE, Zodiac, Relic, Emporio Armani, DKNY, Armani Exchange, Michael Kors, Diesel, Burberry, Marc by Marc Jacobs, Adidas, Skagen Denmark, and Karl Lagerfeld. The Company is constantly developing its multi-brand portfolio through its core competencies in innovative branding, world-class design, and dynamic global distribution.
Highlights

Fossil’s diverse portfolio of world-class brands gives it a unique position in the global marketplace. Each core business yields high-margin profits, in addition to a growing and profitable retail segment. We at Fossil are actively committed to our brands, core values, and community. Our strategically-varied channels of distribution of aspiration lifestyle brands coupled with a strong balance sheet have contributed to our global success for over 25 years and provide significant opportunities for future growth.
The Business

Fossil is comprised of two core businesses: the Fossil brand, and a multi-brand watch business. We believe that the sustainable growth and success of the Company lies in this diversified business model, strengthened by the worldwide appeal of each of the constituent lifestyle brands.
Brand Building

We build world-class brands.

Supported by the best talent in the industry, we specialize in developing the distinct design DNA that defines each brand. We then utilize our world-class global distribution network to bring our collections to life, strategically merchandising these curated product stories to further reinforce the unique strengths of each business                




Senior Vice President, Chief Financial & Accounting Officer

                                    2006 - 2012                


Guess?, Inc.


                  Guess?, Inc. engages in designing, marketing, distributing and licensing of contemporary apparel and accessories for men, women and children that reflect the American lifestyle and European fashion sensibilities. Its product lines include full collections of clothing, including jeans, pants, skirts, dresses, shorts, blouses, shirts, jackets, knitwear and intimate apparel. It operates through the following segments: American Retail, Europe, Asia, North American Wholesale and Licensing. The Americas Retail segment includes the Company's retail and e-Commerce operations in North and Central America and its retail operations in South America. The Europe segment includes the Company's retail, e-Commerce and wholesale operations in Europe and the Middle East. The Asia segment includes the Company's retail, e-Commerce and wholesale operations in Asia. The Americas Wholesale segment includes the Company's wholesale operations in the Americas. The Licensing segment includes the worldwide licensing operations of the Company. The company was founded by Paul Marciano and Maurice Marciano in 1981 and is headquartered in Los Angeles, CA.                




Vice President & Chief Financial Officer, Canadian Division

                                    2004 - Prior                


Electronic Arts, Inc.


                  Electronic Arts, Inc. is a digital interactive entertainment company. The company develops and delivers games, content and online services for Internet-connected consoles, mobile devices and personal computers. Its product brands include The Sims, Madden NFL, EA SPORTS FIFA, Battlefield, Need for Speed, Dragon Age and Plants vs. Zombies .The company was founded by William M. Hawkins III in 1982 and is headquartered in Redwood City, CA.                




Corporate Controller & Chief Accounting Officer

                                    2001 - 2004                


Callaway Golf Co.


                  Callaway Golf Co. engages in the manufacture and distribution of golf equipment and accessories.  It operates through the Golf Clubs and Golf Balls segments. The Golf Clubs segment consists of Callaway Golf woods, hybrids, irons, wedges, and odyssey putters. The Golf Balls segment consists of Callaway Golf and Strata balls that are designed, manufactured, and sold by the company. The company was founded by Ely Reeves Callaway, Jr. in 1982 and is headquartered in Carlsbad, CA.                




European Financial Controller

                                    1996 - 2001                


Polaroid Corp.


                  Polaroid Corp. designs, develops, manufactures and markets instant and digital imaging products. It also offers photographic hardware accessories and instant cameras. The company was founded in 1937 and is located in Waltham, MA.                




Professional

                                    Prior                


Arthur Andersen LLP


                  Arthur Andersen LLP used to provide accounting services. It was also into consulting services for clients that operate businesses throughout the United States and around the world. Arthur Andersen was founded in 1913 and was headquartered in Chicago, IL.                





 Public Holdings






Restricted data only for RelSci Professional users.

Start My Free Trial ➤








See  More 


 


 Awards & Honors




                  Professional Certification                




CPA (Certified Public Accountant)

                                    Sponsored by
                  American Institute of Certified Public Accountants






 Other Affiliations




              Dennis R. Secor is affiliated with
                            Fossil Group, Inc., Guess?, Inc., Electronic Arts, Inc., Callaway Golf Co., Polaroid Corp., Arthur Andersen LLP.
            





You've reached your 10 free profiles limit this month.
Upgrade to RelSci Pro today to enjoy unlimited article views and much more!

Start My Free Trial  ➤

Still not convinced? Check out our full listing of features here.












Are you a RelSci Pro Subscriber?

Login to RelSci Pro 
                        ➤


Not a Pro Subscriber? Log in here to manage your alerts









 Keep me signed in.
        

Login  ➤



        Forgot your Password?
    

























 I have read the LexisNexis terms & conditions




Sign Me Up  ➤















	
        Compensation Information for Dennis R. Secor , Executive Vice President, Chief Financial Officer and Treasurer of FOSSIL GROUP INC | Salary.com
    


























Enterprise
Small Business
Personal




Contact Us
Log In


































Salaries
Jobs
Education
Advice
























 





Dennis R. Secor 
Executive Compensation
As Executive Vice President, Chief Financial Officer and Treasurer at FOSSIL GROUP INC, Dennis R. Secor  made $1,418,916 in total compensation.  Of this total $597,115 was received as a salary, $176,250 was received as a bonus, $225,042 was received in stock options, $388,249 was awarded as stock and $32,260 came from other types of compensation. This information is according to proxy statements filed for the 2016 fiscal year. 


ENTER AN EXECUTIVE OR COMPANY NAME
New Search


Go



The chart on this page features a breakdown of the total annual pay for Dennis R. Secor ,  Executive Vice President, Chief Financial Officer and Treasurer at FOSSIL GROUP INC as reported in their proxy statements. 
Total Cash Compensation information is comprised of yearly Base Pay and Bonuses. FOSSIL GROUP INC income statements for executive base pay and bonus are filed yearly with the SEC in the edgar filing system. FOSSIL GROUP INC annual reports of executive compensation and pay are most commonly found in the Def 14a documents.
Total Equity aggregates grant date fair value of stock and option awards and long term incentives granted during the fiscal year.
Other Compensation covers all compensation-like awards that don't fit in any of these other standard categories. Numbers reported do not include change in pension value and non-qualified deferred compensation earnings.



Other Executives at this Company


Kosta N. Kartsotis 
Darren E. Hart 
John A. White 
Steve A. Evans 







Dennis R. Secor 


Base Pay$597,115
Bonus + Incentive Comp$176,250
Total Cash Compensation$773,365


Stock Award Value$388,249
Option Award Value$225,042
Total Equity$613,291



Total Other$32,260



Total Compensation$1,418,916




Browse Executives by First Name
A
B
C
D
E
F
G
H
I
J
K
L
M
N
O
P
Q
R
S
T
U
V
W
X
Y
Z


Browse Companies by Company Name
A
B
C
D
E
F
G
H
I
J
K
L
M
N
O
P
Q
R
S
T
U
V
W
X
Y
Z
#



This report is not for commercial use. Thorough reviews have been conducted to assure this data accurately reflects disclosures. However for a complete and definitive understanding of the pay practices of any company, users should refer directly to the actual, complete proxy statement. 
Use of Data / Disclaimer
The information shown here is a reporting of information included in the company's proxy statement. The proxy statement includes footnotes and explanations of this information plus other information that is pertinent in assessing the overall value and appropriateness of the compensation information. For those interested in conducting a detailed compensation analysis, we recommend that you review the entire proxy statement. You may retrieve the full proxy statement by going to the Securities and Exchange Commission (SEC) website at www.sec.gov and entering the company's name and then looking in the first column for an entry of "Form DEF 14A" (or any similar code). You may also find the annual proxy statement by going directly to the company's website.
What is a proxy statement?
A proxy statement (or "proxy") is a form that every publicly traded U.S. company is required to file with the U.S. Securities & Exchange Commission (SEC) within 120 days after the end of its fiscal year. The proxy must be sent to every shareholder in advance of the company's annual shareholders meeting. All proxy statements are public filings made available to the general public by the SEC.
The proxy statement's main purpose is to alert shareholders to the annual meeting and provide them information about the issues that will be voted on during the annual meeting, including decisions such as electing directors, ratifying the selection of auditors, and other shareholder-related decisions, including shareholder-initiated initiatives. Also, proxies must disclose specific detailed information regarding the pay practices for certain executives.







    





 

 






     

privacy policy
terms of use
about us
contact us

©  Salary.com. All rights reserved.


US Salaries
Canadian Salaries
Purchase a Salary Report
Salaries by Category
Salaries by Income
Salaries by Industry
Popular Salaries
Negotiation Tips
Benefits Calculator
Search Job Openings
Job Openings by State
Job Openings by Category
Education by Career
Education by Level
Education by Major
Cost of Living Calculator
























 



FOSL Dennis R. Secor Insider Trades for Fossil Group Inc.


































Bulletin






Investor Alert





















Expand
Keep Open
Close






Expand
Keep Open
Close






Expand
Keep Open
Close






Expand
Keep Open
Close






Expand
Keep Open
Close































Fossil Group Inc.

                  NASDAQ: FOSL
          



GO



Set Alerts
Find a Broker




Join TD Ameritrade




Market Index


 

Overview
      
Profile
      
News
      
Charts
      
Financials
      
Historical Quotes
      
Analyst Estimates
      
Options
      
SEC Filings
      
Insiders
      


/marketstate/country/us

Fossil Group Inc.



After Hours
 --Quotes are delayed by 20 min
Jul 21, 2017, 6:36 p.m.


FOSL

/quotes/zigman/17693969/composite


$
10.64




Change

-0.10
-0.93%

Volume
Volume 99,385
Quotes are delayed by 20 min








/quotes/zigman/17693969/composite
Previous close

$
			10.87
		


$
				10.74
			
Change

-0.13
-1.20%





Day low
Day high
$10.55
$10.91










52 week low
52 week high

            $8.98
        

            $36.87
        


















Insider Activity


Individual




Dennis R. Secor



Mr. Dennis R. Secor, CPA, is CFO, Treasurer, Principal Accounting Officer & EVP at Fossil Group, Inc. Mr. Secor was previously employed as Senior VP, Chief Financial & Accounting Officer by Guess?, Inc., Chief Financial Officer-Canadian Division & VP by Electronic Arts, Inc., Senior Vice President-Finance by Callaway Golf Co., and European Financial Controller by Polaroid Corp. He received his undergraduate degree from the University of San Diego.



Transactions


Date
Shares
Transaction
Value





04/15/2017
40,389


 
Award at $0 per share.


0


04/15/2017
35,902


 
Award at $0 per share.


0


03/15/2017
1,773


 
Derivative/Non-derivative trans. at $16.42 per share.


29,113


03/15/2017
1,773


 
Derivative/Non-derivative trans. at $16.42 per share.


29,113


03/02/2017
138


 
Derivative/Non-derivative trans. at $18.88 per share.


2,606


03/02/2017
504


 
Award at $0 per share.


0


03/02/2017
454


 
Award at $0 per share.


0


12/22/2016
2,483


 
Derivative/Non-derivative trans. at $0 per share.


0


11/24/2016
2,427


 
Derivative/Non-derivative trans. at $0 per share.


0


03/15/2016
9,378


 
Award at $0 per share.


0


12/22/2015
27,230


 
Award at $0 per share.


0


11/24/2015
26,614


 
Award at $0 per share.


0


03/15/2015
6,050


 
Award at $0 per share.


0


03/15/2015
537


 
Derivative/Non-derivative trans. at $0 per share.


0


01/15/2015
314


 
Derivative/Non-derivative trans. at $0 per share.


0


03/15/2014
3,995


 
Award at $0 per share.


0


03/15/2014
172


 
Derivative/Non-derivative trans. at $0 per share.


0


01/15/2014
308


 
Derivative/Non-derivative trans. at $0 per share.


0


03/15/2013
1,880


 
Award at $0 per share.


0


01/15/2013
3,014


 
Award at $0 per share.


0





        Copyright 2017 FactSet Research Systems Inc. All rights reserved. Source FactSet Fundamentals.
    











            Officers and Executives
        





Mr. Kosta N. Kartsotis 
Chairman & Chief Executive Officer




Mr. John A. White 
Chief Operating Officer & Executive Vice President




Mr. Dennis R. Secor 
CFO, Treasurer, Principal Accounting Officer & EVP




Mr. Steve Andrew Evans 
Executive Vice President-Fossil Brand




Mr. Eric  Anderson 
Executive Vice President-Portfolio Brands




Mr. Christopher  King 
Chief Compliance Officer & Head-Internal Audit




Mr. Gregory A. McKelvey 
Chief Strategy & Digital Officer, Executive VP




Mr. Mark D. Quick 
Director




Ms. Ann Jane Draper 
Media Contact




Mr. Eric M. Cerny 
Investor Relations Contact




Mr. Darren E. Hart 
Executive Vice President-Human Resources




Mr. Randy S. Hyne 
Secretary, VP-Legal & General Counsel




Ms. Mauria A. Finley 
Independent Director




Mr. James E. Skinner 
Independent Director




Mr. Jeffrey N. Boyer 
Independent Director




Mr. James M. Zimmerman 
Lead Independent Director




Ms. Diane L. Neal 
Independent Director




Mr. Thomas M. Nealon 
Independent Director




Mr. William B. Chiasson 
Independent Director









Trending Tickers


/quotes/zigman/17636479/composite VUZI+15.60%


/quotes/zigman/237947/composite JCP-5.83%


/quotes/zigman/59392505/composite NUGT-2.93%


/quotes/zigman/59386294/composite JNUG-5.94%


/quotes/zigman/65801738/composite TLT+1.11%


X




Powered by














Log In




3:53 PM EDT
July 22, 2017


/marketstate/country/us
New York

	Closed


/marketstate/country/uk
London

	Closed


/marketstate/country/jp
Tokyo

	Closed





/marketstate/country/us
 


/marketstate/country/uk
 


/marketstate/country/jp
 











View All



Latest News

/news/latest
3:30pYou can date someone who looks just like Donald Trump with this new online service 
3:29pWant to buy happiness? Splurge on these 5 things
3:28pThis is what people really buy when they emotionally overspend (hint: it’s not designer clothes)
2:40pJohn McCain is a war hero — but think twice before saying he’s ‘battling’ cancer 
2:38pThe dark side of cruises
2:37pI want to buy my brothers out of our family home — but they want me to pay (future) sales fees
2:35pO.J. Simpson made over $400,000 while in prison and won’t have to give any of it to the Goldman family
2:34pNot even free money can make some people go to the gym 
2:34pHow real-estate TV shows determine what buyers look for in a house
2:34pWhat Eleanor Roosevelt and Helen Gurley Brown ate — and what we can learn from it 
2:33pNote to parents: This social network was rated the worst for teenage cyberbullying
2:33pIf, like Sean Spicer, you suddenly quit your job — what should you do next?
2:32pThis is the deadliest time of your life to put on weight
2:32p5 unfortunate reasons why millennials can’t have nice things (or save any money)
2:26pU.S. giving takeover bids by Chinese firms much tougher look
1:13pJared Kushner discloses dozens of additional assets in revised filing
12:51pBitcoin surges as miners avert split for now
12:00pAlphabet earnings: A $2.74 billion hit for Google, potential YouTube results for investors
11:49aHow OPEC committee’s coming meeting could make or break oil prices
11:15aA grandfather’s financial advice to his grandchildren
Loading more headlines...




dow

/quotes/zigman/627449/realtime
21,580.07

-31.71
-0.15%





nasdaq

/quotes/zigman/12633936/realtime
6,387.75

-2.25
-0.04%





s&p 500

/quotes/zigman/3870025/realtime
2,472.54

-0.91
-0.04%













Kiosk


1352872800000
1352872800000


The RetireMentors






				Retirement advice from our industry experts
				Our team of financial professionals can help you plan and save 
					for retirement, then 
				live well in it.



/conga/kiosk/retirementors.html
361307




1320411600000
1320616500000


Alerts



/conga/kiosk/alerts.html
310238




1333717800000
1333964100000


Virtual Stock Exchange





Our free stock-market game
				• Trade your virtual portfolio in real time
				• Talk strategies in group discussions
				• Find or create a game that suits you
				• Use our learning center to improve 



/conga/kiosk/games.html
310284




1245657600000
1277280000000


Location Scouts




Housing-market insights from our realty pros
																																																							Plus the latest data from Realtor.com on 21 home markets across the U.S.
• See our complete Real Estate site


/conga/kiosk/real_estate.html
357012




1404799200000
1404799200000


Lazy Portfolios





				Set it and forget it
				Check out the returns on our 8 Lazy Portfolios that are made up 
				of low-cost 
				buy-and-hold index funds.

				• How to create your own Lazy Portfolio


/conga/kiosk/lazy_portfolio.html
313134














MarketWatch.com




Site Index
Topics
Help
Feedback
Newsroom Roster

                    Media Archive
Premium Products
Mobile


Company Info
Code of Conduct
Corrections
Advertising Media Kit
Advertise Locally
Reprints & Licensing
Broker Center

                    Your Ad Choices


Follow MarketWatch


































RSS
Podcasts






WSJ.com
Barron's Online
BigCharts
Virtual Stock Exchange


Financial News London
WSJ.com Small Business
realtor.com
Mansion Global












		Copyright © 2017 MarketWatch, Inc.  All rights reserved.
		By using this site, you agree to the Terms of Service,
        Privacy Policy and Cookie Policy.
	



            Intraday Data provided by SIX Financial Information and subject to terms of use. Historical and current end-of-day data provided by SIX Financial Information. All quotes are in local exchange time. Real-time last sale data for U.S. stock quotes reflect trades reported through Nasdaq only. Intraday data delayed at least 15 minutes or per exchange requirements.
        






MarketWatch Top Stories
Link to MarketWatch's Slice.

15

























































Dennis R Secor - Carlsbad, CA | Intelius



























Sign In



We found Dennis R Secor in Carlsbad, CA


Dennis R Secor

                                                                        Intelius found that Dennis R Secor  from Carlsbad, CA.  We have connected them to
                2 addresses,
                2 phones,
                and 0 relatives or associates.
         






Get Report Now

Dennis Has Lived In

Carlsbad, CA
Los Angeles, CA







Dennis R Secor



Professional Status
Chief Financial Officer at Guess? , Inc.



Get Report Now










Want to know more about Dennis? Get a comprehensive background report, find full phone numbers, and other contact information when available, all from billions of available public records.
            Continue below for more details about Dennis, or use our people search engine to find others.
Get Background Check on Dennis R Secor
Get a Criminal Check on Dennis R Secor
Get a Public Record Report on Dennis R Secor
Get a People Search Report on Dennis R Secor


Dennis R Secor's Contact Information
Known Cities Lived In
Find out where Dennis R Secor has lived as well as Dennis R Secor's phone numbers and email addresses.




Dennis R Secor Has Lived in 1 States
California Address for Dennis R Secor


2180 R********* R* 

Carlsbad, CA


Has Lived In

Carlsbad, CA
Los Angeles, CA


Get Full Address Report










Phone Numbers Associated with Dennis R Secor

(760) ***-**** - Carlsbad, CA 
(213) ***-**** - Los Angeles, CA 


Get Full Phone Report



Email Addresses Associated with Dennis R Secor

d*****s@***.com
s**********r@***.com
d******e@***.com


Get Email Report




Dennis R Secor's Professional Information
Information regarding Dennis R Secor's professional history.  Find out previous places Dennis R Secor has worked as well as dates employed.
            The following data is not guaranteed for accuracy and should not be used for employment, insurance, credit eligibility, or for any other purpose covered under the Fair Credit Reporting Act.


Dennis R Secor Has Worked at 3 Places
Company: Guess? , Inc.
               Title: Chief Financial Officer
Company: Guess? , Inc.
               Title: Senior Vice President Human Resources
Dennis R Secor's Experience
Title: Chief Financial Officer
               Company: Guess? , Inc.
Job Details
               Company Size: $1 bil and above - Employee Range: 5,000 to less than 25,000
Title: Senior Vice President Human Resources
               Company: Guess? , Inc.
Job Details
               Company Size: $1 bil and above - Employee Range: 5,000 to less than 25,000
Additional Professional Information on Dennis R Secor

 See Dennis R Secor's LinkedIn Profile



Dennis R Secor's Social Network and Potential Email Matches
Find out potential social network profiles and potential email usernamed for Dennis R Secor


Dennis R Secor's known Social Networks And Potential Email Matches

Find all of Dennis R Secor's Social Network Profiles

Get Full Report

Search Social Networks
Including Facebook, LinkedIn, MySpace, Google, Twitter, Yahoo, Jigsaw, ZoomInfo and more



Potential Email Matches
Dennis Secor
Username Matches

                  DennisSecor
                  SecorDennis
                  Dennis.Secor
                  Secor.Dennis
                  Dennis_Secor
                  Secor_Dennis
                  Dennis-Secor
                  Secor-Dennis
                  DSecor
               


Popular Email Services

@gmail.com
@aol.com
@yahoo.com
@comcast.net
@hotmail.com
@msn.com
@rocketmail.com
@att.net
@sbcglobal.net
@ymail.com
@facebook.com
@mail.com
@bellsouth.net
@live.com
@earthlink.net
@cox.net
@prodigy.net
@me.com
@peoplepc.com
@juno.com
@rediffmail.com
@mindspring.com
@comcast.com
@charter.net
@outlook.com




All trademarks, product names, company names or logos on this page are the property of their respective owners.
Related People Searches
D Secor







         Intelius is a leading provider of public data about people and their connections to others. Intelius does not provide consumer reports and is not a consumer reporting agency as defined by the Fair Credit Reporting Act (FCRA). This site should not be used to determine an individual’s eligibility for credit, insurance, employment, housing or any other purpose covered by the FCRA. For employment or tenant screening services, please visit our partner Talentwise.
      

About Us
Site Map
About Our Reports
Blog
Help
Contact Us

© 2003 – 2017 PeopleConnect, Inc. d/b/a Intelius. All Rights Reserved.
         Privacy Policy - UPDATED
Terms of Service - UPDATED






What is the FCRA?
The Fair Credit Reporting Act ("FCRA") is a federal law that promotes the accuracy, fairness and privacy of information in the files of consumer reporting agencies.
Intelius does not provide consumer reports and is not a consumer reporting agency as defined by the FCRA. Intelius reports cannot be used for background checks related to consumer credit, insurance, employment, housing or any other purpose
                  prohibited under the FCRA.
You may not use any information obtained from Intelius for any purpose covered by the FCRA.
Find out more about the FCRA here.













Executive Profile | Fossil, Inc. | Dennis R. Secor | Customer Intelligence

































































                    Home
                  



					About Us	
                  



					Pricing	
                  



					Contact	
                  



					Resources	
                  



					Blog	
                  



Log In















 











Dennis R. Secor 

		
		EVP, CFO and Treasurer, 

	
		 Fossil, Inc. 	

 
Last Updated: 01/12/2017 



Executive Summary
Secor is Executive Vice President, Chief Financial Officer and Treasurer of Fossil Inc., a Richardson, Texas-based company that designs, develops, markets, and distributes consumer fashion accessories worldwide. He joined Fossil in December 2012 after serving for more than six years as Senior Vice President and CFO for Guess?, which de 
Personal Attributes and Interests

When Secor was hired as CFO in December 2012, Fossil CEO Kosta Kartsotis said, "We are very excited to have Dennis join our team. He brings diverse industry and international experience along with strong business and customer focus. Den 
Current Focus

Become a leaner company: In January 2017 Fossil Group laid off an unspecified number of corporate employees at its headquarters in Richardson, Texas. According to the spokeswoman Ann Jane Draper the layoffs affected emp 
Key Challenges

Risks affecting results: Secor told analysts in November 2016, “…On our last call, we shared what we saw as the principal risk that we reflected in our earnings guidance range. First, the traditional watch  
Biographical Highlights

Born circa 1962.
Secor earned a Bachelor’s degree in Business Administration, with a concentration in Accounting, from the University of San Diego, graduating summa cum laude in May 1984. 
 





These companies are using Boardroom Insiders to close bigger deals, faster:























View Full Samples Now!














			WATCH OUR VIDEO
			



















© 2017 Boardroom Insiders, Inc. All rights reserved. 
All trademarks are the property of their respective owners.


Privacy Policy
Contact Us
















Fossil Group (FOSL) Q1 2017 Results - Earnings Call Transcript | Seeking AlphaSign in / Join NowGO»Fossil Group (FOSL) Q1 2017 Results - Earnings Call TranscriptMay. 9.17 | About: Fossil, Inc. (FOSL) Fossil Group, Inc. (NASDAQ:FOSL)
Q1 2017 Earnings Call
May 09, 2017 4:30 pm ET
Executives
Eric M. Cerny - Fossil Group, Inc.
Kosta N. Kartsotis - Fossil Group, Inc.
Dennis R. Secor - Fossil Group, Inc.
Gregory A. McKelvey - Fossil Group, Inc.
Analysts
Edward J. Yruma - Pacific Crest Securities
Omar Saad - Evercore Group LLC
Oliver Chen - Cowen and Company, LLC
Erinn E. Murphy - Piper Jaffray & Co.
Simeon Avram Siegel - Nomura Securities
Anna Andreeva - Oppenheimer & Co., Inc.
Dana Telsey - Telsey Advisory Group
Randal J. Konik - Jefferies LLC
Ike Boruchow - Wells Fargo Securities LLC
Heather N. Balsky - Bank of America Merrill Lynch
Operator
Good day, ladies and gentlemen, and welcome to Fossil Group's First Quarter 2017 Earnings Conference Call. At this time, all participants are in listen-only mode. Later, we will conduct the question-and-answer session, and instructions will follow at that time. As a reminder, this conference is being recorded.
I'd like to introduce your host for today's conference, Mr. Eric Cerny, Investor Relations of the Fossil Group.
Eric M. Cerny - Fossil Group, Inc.
Thank you. Good afternoon, everyone. Thank you for joining us and welcome to Fossil Group's 2017 earnings conference call.
I would like to remind you that information made available during this conference call contains forward-looking information and actual results could differ materially from those that will be projected during this call. Fossil Group's policy on forward-looking statements and additional information concerning a number of factors that could cause actual results to differ materially from such statements is readily available in our Form 8-K and 10-Q reports filed with the SEC. In addition, the company assumes no obligation to publicly update or revise any forward-looking statements, whether as a result of new information, future events or otherwise, except as required by law.
Please note that you can find a reconciliation and other information regarding non-GAAP financial measures discussed on this call and our earnings release filed on Form 8-K and in the Investors section of our website. Please note you may listen to a live webcast or a replay of this call by visiting fossilgroup.com under the Investors section.
Now, I would like to turn the call over to the company's Chairman and CEO, Kosta Kartsotis.
Kosta N. Kartsotis - Fossil Group, Inc.
Thanks, and good afternoon, everyone. I will begin with a few prepared remarks before turning the call over to Dennis Secor, our Chief Financial Officer. Following his prepared remarks, Greg McKelvey, our Chief Strategy and Digital Officer, will join us for the Q&A.
Our results for the quarter, while largely in line with our expectations, continue to reflect a challenging retail environment and the watch category undergoing significant change. The strategies we are pursuing in the midst of these headwinds enable us to better compete in the environment and capitalize on the growing importance of technology to the watch category.
The newness and the innovation that we are infusing into our fashion accessories is gaining traction with our retail partners and consumers alike, demonstrating that technology can be the catalyst needed to drive growth in watches. We are very excited about the next generation of products we are developing and launching throughout the year.
Our design, technology and engineering expertise were on display at the important Basel Watch Fair, where we received a very positive response to our assortment and the improved functionality. We believe we are in a position to further expand our leadership position in the fashion accessory space, expand our addressable market and improve our financial performance.
Our focus for the year continues to be on executing against our New World Fossil restructuring initiative, driving growth in our core watch business and advancing our wearable products within an expanded offering across additional brands.

With wearables, we continue to re-imagine the watch and its capabilities. Innovation has always been at the heart of what we do, which is what makes this period of disruption in watches a very exciting time for our team. We are on track to launch over 300 SKUs this year with enhanced engineering that will enable slimmer cases, more functionality and brighter screens.
We are excited to bring five more brands on to our wearables platform, including DKNY, and Marc Jacobs, MICHELE, Relic and Tory Burch, to the nine other brands we introduced in 2016. Our new products for this year will include slimmer and smaller hybrid smartwatches and full round touchscreen smartwatches with custom displays and branded micro apps to create a portfolio of fashion-first technology accessories.
Within hybrid smartwatches, we will introduce new design variations that include increased functional side pushers, allowing for various customizable tasks and notifications. All of the 14 brands from our portfolio of wearables will benefit from this enhanced functionality.
Hybrid smartwatches represent an opportunity to reach a new generation of watches wearers, and we believe we are uniquely positioned to revolutionize the watch space with these accessories given our depth of brand offerings.
Our 2017 touchscreen smartwatches will see improvements in every way, from better screen resolution to smaller cases sizes and branded micro apps, enabled by the launch of Android Wear 2.0.
Our internal software development team has created apps to offer unique functionalities that align with the look and feel of each brand, a capability made possible through the acquisition of Misfit and the development of our engineering team. In addition to updated Fossil and Michael Kors' touchscreen watches, we'll expand the offering to Emporio Armani, Diesel and Misfit, which we'll all launch this fall.
With the Misfit Vapor, we'll introduce new features such as optical heart rate monitoring and swim-proof functionality, our first product to offer those features. We continue to broaden our distribution and consumer electronics channels with our new wearables products enabling us to work with new wholesale partners.
Based on the success across the smaller set of stores and the channel during the fourth quarter, we're working to significantly expand the number of doors we distribute to in the CE channel. We're moving quickly and reacting to what the consumer is telling us about the new wearable product.
Along those lines, we have simplified the pricing for the Fossil Q assortment offering two price points in hybrids and two price points in display, providing an even more competitive and compelling offer for the consumer.
Driving volume and leveraging the scale we bring to the category is enabling us to improve our product costs, a goal we communicated coming into the year. We are very encouraged by the team's ability to deliver some of these benefits earlier than we originally expected and will continue to drive further progress to provide the right long-term product margins for the category.
As we shared with you in February, with the addition of technology and new functionality in our watches, we are expanding our addressable market beyond the single category traditional watch space we once competed in. We are now poised to take advantage of the growth in the wearables space, while continuing to leverage our competitive strengths in the traditional watch business in order to increase our share in the combined market.
At the New World Fossil, we continue to execute against this initiative as we create a leaner and more nimble operating platform, capable of better serving our customer and competing in this new retail environment.
During the first quarter, we took expense reduction actions that will better position the organization to support our growth-driving initiatives, while focusing fewer resources on areas of the business that are not as high a priority currently.

We will continue to be disciplined in our approach to managing capital required to navigate New World Fossil. This is a very broad initiative, which demands that we strategically prioritize actions that generate the best returns on our capital investments, actions designed to enhance our organizational structure, as well as our supply chain, an area that can further drive gross margin and profitability improvements over time.
As we continue to advance our comprehensive plan to evolve our business model for the future, we are very pleased with the progress the team has made. With what we have accomplished so far, we are on target to deliver about 40% of New World Fossil's profit enhancement goal this year and the initiatives we're driving today should position us to deliver even more against our overall $200 million goal.
We're very encouraged by the speed with which the organization is adapting to these changes and the commitment shown across the organization to be more disciplined in the way we operate and delivering the expected benefits from this process.
Another area of our business we continue to focus on is driving growth in our own brands. This will continue to be a focus for us as we work to further grow Fossil and Skagen and look for other initiatives that can drive our own revenues.
First quarter results for both brands reflect a softer wholesale environment and weaker traffic in the retail space. However, Skagen was able to deliver a flat performance in the quarter and Fossil declined 10%, both in constant currency.
Fossil declined largely driven by a weaker performance in leathers, a category we are working hard to improve with upcoming design improvements. Our wearables product continues to perform well and we have initiatives in the pipeline to further grow that portion of the business, in addition to the pricing changes I mentioned earlier.
In traditional watches, we are continuing to innovate and have identified several trends that we are distorting. You will also see Fossil launching a new media campaign with an emphasis on social, digital and print marketing utilizing authentic brand ambassadors. These ambassadors were strategically chosen to introduce the Fossil Q product to a wide range of ages and prospective watch wearers, while staying true to the brand heritage.
In closing, our entire team is very energized by the challenge in front of us and focused on growing our core watch business through innovation and leveraging our core competitive strengths. All of our strategic advantages continue to make us the leader in our space and differentiate us from many of our competitors, as we actively seek to add new brands to further enhance our portfolio.
With technology and innovation, we have strengthened our position, and we believe we are on the right track to improve our financial performance, see significant growth in our wearables business this year, as the products grow to represent a much larger percent of our business. And we remain confident in our strategic priorities and the initiatives we are pursuing given their ability to positively impact our results and drive long-term shareholder value.
We will continue to expand our addressable market with successful wearable product launches that leverage our proven design and branding expertise, further establishing our leadership position in the fashion accessories space.
And now I would like to turn the call over to Dennis for additional color on our financial performance. As you'll hear, we are adjusting our outlook for the year, primarily given further pressure on gross margin due to promotional activity in our outlet channel. The retail landscape is very challenging right now.
While we are very focused on our long-term strategies and the opportunities they represent, we are mindful of the need to balance those with the near-term challenges in the business. We are focused on this and have not lost sight of the importance of striking that balance. Dennis?

Dennis R. Secor - Fossil Group, Inc.
Thanks, Kosta, and good afternoon, everyone. Our first quarter results were largely in-line with our expectations as constant currency net sales decreased 11% and on a reported basis decreased to $582 million. During the quarter, we continued to advance our strategy in wearables driving significant growth in the category, particularly smartwatches, which helped to mitigate the decline in traditional watches.
That decline, combined with the continued softness in leathers, resulted in sales at the lower end of our expectations. For the quarter, we delivered results within our range of expectations and reported a net loss per share of $1, including restructuring charges of $0.35 per share compared to earnings of $0.12 last year. The decline compared to last year was primarily driven by lower sales and gross margins and restructuring charges, mitigated partially by lower operating expenses.
First quarter loss per share was positively impacted by $0.11 due to changes in foreign currency with a strong U.S. dollar negatively impacting our sales and operating margins, however, operating gains from hedging activity more than offset that negative impact.
On a year-over-year comparison, the impact from currency was essentially neutral given last year's $0.10 positive impact from non-operating contract gains.
To recap the quarter's sales performance; as we expected, we had a tough comparison in the first quarter given Q1 of 2016 saw greater sell-in across our brands and channels. In addition, the consolidation of our retail store fleet also contributed to our sales decline as we operated with roughly 40 fewer stores compared to last year's first quarter.
Wearables represented 7% of our sales across product categories and over 75% of those sales came from smartwatches, significantly impacting the trend in the watch category for our key brands. For Michael Kors, while watch sales did decline in the quarter, once again smartwatches positively impacted overall watch trends for the brand by double-digit.
Fossil declined 10% in constant dollars compared to last year, mainly driven by leathers. Despite a low single-digit decline in watches, smartwatches had a significantly positive impact on the watch category for the brand, nearly offsetting the entire decline in traditional watches.
Skagen sales were flat compared to last year with all categories performing similarly. In the retail channel, comp store sales, including e-comm sales, which grew 20% for the quarter, declined 11% due to further deceleration in traffic trends in our retail stores.
Now from a regional perspective; in the Americas, first quarter sales decreased 17% to $278 million with traditional watches and leathers driving the decline. Declines across all the brands in the portfolio were driven by decreases in traditional watches, primarily offset by connected watches with our strongest performance coming from Michael Kors Access. Both wholesale and retail sales declined at similar rates in the quarter.
In Europe, reported sales decreased 7% to $196 million, a 3% constant dollar decrease. Our relatively flat performance in jewelry and watches with declines in traditional watches offset by connected watches was offset by a decline in leathers. Within the region, continued growth in Skagen and increases in Armani Exchange and Michael Kors were offset by declines in the other brands in the portfolio. Modest growth in Spain was offset by declines in the UK and Middle East with both the wholesale and retail channels decreasing across the region.
In Asia, sales decreased 5% to $109 million with declines in watches led by traditional watches and leathers driving the decrease. Growth in India and China was offset by a decline in Japan and Australia.

In the quarter, gross profit decreased to $290 million and gross margin declined 300 basis points to 49.8%. Lower margin in the retail channel, primarily due to increased promotions to drive sales in our outlets and online, as well as a higher mix of connected products, which currently deliver lower margins were the biggest drivers of the decline. The negative impact of changes in foreign currencies and an increase in the relative mix of off price sales, which were flat to last year, also contributed to the decline.
International mix partially offset those headwinds did as the initial benefits we are seeing from our New World Fossil initiatives and we expect those improvements to expand as we move throughout the year. First quarter operating expenses were $335 million or 57.5% of sales and included $26 million of restructuring costs associated with realigning and optimizing our organizational structure plus store closure cost, primarily in the Americas.
Excluding those items, expenses were significantly lower compared to the first quarter of last year as we begin to realize the initial benefits of New World Fossil. Marketing expenses were also lower than a year ago, as we shifted marketing investments to the second and third quarters to better create awareness and support our significant wearables rollout this year.
Our first quarter operating loss was $45 million, driven by lower sales in gross margins. Expenses were flat as reductions in our ongoing operating expenses offset the $26 million impact of restructuring charges.
First quarter other income increased roughly $3 million to 6 million, due to more favorable foreign currency activity. Interest expense increased roughly $2 million, due to higher interest rates. Our effective income tax rate for the quarter was roughly 3% compared to last year's 31%, due to changes in tax accounting rules and jurisdictional earnings.
While we had anticipated a small tax charge in the quarter, we ultimately recorded a small benefit, primarily due to our updated estimate for restructuring charges this year, which I will address shortly.
Now, turning to our cash flows and balance sheet. During the quarter, we generated operating cash flow of $51 million, invested $4 million in CapEx and reduced borrowings by $16 million. We improved our net debt position by roughly $221 million compared to a year ago.
We ended the quarter with roughly $321 million in cash compared to $307 million last year and debt of $616 million compared to $823 million a year ago. Inventory levels at the end of the first quarter were down 9% with traditional watch inventories down substantially, enabling us to both invest in wearables inventories to drive growth, while also reducing our overall investment in inventory.
Accounts receivable increased by 4% to roughly $245 million and wholesale DSOs increased by 7 days compared to the prior year, due to timing and shifts in customer mix. Depreciation and amortization expense totaled $21 million for the quarter.
During the quarter, we amended and extended our credit agreement with our banks. This amendment extends the facility until May 2019 and among other things, provides us with greater covenant flexibility during our peak working capital periods.
The amendment also included a higher fee structure, which we had already anticipated. We're pleased to have the support of our banking partners as we work through the transformation of our business and navigate a challenging retail environment.
Let's now move to our outlook. With the first quarter now behind us, we're updating our outlook for the year to reflect our experience and learning from the first quarter. Let me start with our operational results and then later give an update on our New World Fossil restructuring investments.

So on operations let me start with our traditional business. In our traditional business, while sales continued to decline, first quarter sales were modestly stronger than we had planned going into the quarter. We are experiencing an intensifying competitive environment, mainly in our outlets and international concessions, necessitating a greater use of promotions to drive sales in our stores as we compete for consumer spending.
This put more pressure on gross margins, particularly in the second half of the quarter. We were able to mitigate some of that pressure though by further containing expenses, but not enough to fully mitigate the margin headwind. We expect this promotional trend to carry throughout the balance of the year, which is reflected in our updated guidance.
Next, in wearables, while we increased sales by nearly 400% compared to last year, our selling plans were short of our initial plans for the quarter. In the quarter, we also continued working with our licensed partners and now have better visibility into our distribution plans for 2017.
With our ambitious plans, we don't expect we will get all the distribution we had initially anticipated in place this year, though with the expansion of wearables across a larger portion of our brand portfolio, we continue to expect that we could roughly triple our penetration of wearables revenues, which represented roughly 5% of last year sales.
From an earnings perspective, while we're adjusting the upper end of our sales expectations to reflect our updated distribution plans, we don't expect a significant impact to earnings. Based on the greater visibility we now have into our wearable supply chain and product costing, and our first quarter wearables margins, we expect that our wearables margins will be stronger than we had anticipated at the beginning of the year.
Based on these factors, we are updating our annual sales expectations in the range between down 1.5% and 6%, both of which include roughly a 1.5 point currency headwind. We expect our sales growth rates to improve sequentially throughout the year, as we rollout more brands on to our wearables platform progressively throughout the year.
Next to gross margins; we continue to plan that overall gross margins will be down compared to last year, given currency headwinds and the impact of wearables margins on our mix. We are updating our expectations to reflect further headwinds due to the promotional retail environment mainly for traditional watches. Given our better-than-planned wearables cost, we do expect that the mix impact from wearables will not be as severe as we had initially expected.
Moving to expenses; coming out of our first quarter, our team has identified further areas where we can reduce operating costs, gaining greater efficiencies in our operational processes, including accelerating some of our New World Fossil cost benefits into 2017. Our goal is to use these further cost reductions to mitigate anticipated gross margin pressures for the remainder of the year, though we do not expect that we will be able to fully offset these further margin headwinds this year.
For the full year, excluding restructuring charges, we continue to expect to operate with substantially lower expenses throughout the year. After restructuring charges, we've updated our plans for the year to focus 2017 investments on activities that deliver near-term cash payback. As a result, we're now planning to defer some of our planned store closures and now expect total 2017 restructuring charges of roughly $45 million, $12 million of which we expect to incur in the second quarter.
Overall for the year, we expect total expenses to be lower than last year and we expect to operate with the total expense rate that is flat to down compared to last year. We now expect to operate with an operating margin between 1.5% and 2.2%, which includes roughly a 90 basis point headwind related to currencies. We now expect full-year earnings per share in the range between a loss of $0.40 per share and earnings of $0.30 per share.

These updated expectations include a $0.60 restructuring charge, which is $0.41 lower than our previous expectations. Given our adjustment and expected restructuring charges and variability and jurisdictional mix, our guidance now assumes a tax rate in the low 20% range at the lower end and the low 30% range at the upper end and we have adjusted our guidance to reflect this change.
We continue to assume higher interest expense this year compared to a year ago, given our financing activities. And assuming exchange rates remain at prevailing levels, based on our other expectations, we'd expect non-operating currency net benefits roughly similar to last year's levels.
Based on our current estimates, as we move into the back half of the year, we expect our earnings to sequentially improve. We continue to expect gross margin pressures to be strongest in the third quarter, given the greatest year-over-year change in connected mix relative to last year.
We continue to expect that our planned shift of greater advertising investments into the third quarter will likely dampen the earnings benefit of our anticipated wearables growth. And we also continue to expect that expense timing to turn in the fourth quarter when we expect to generate a substantial majority of this year's earnings.
For the second quarter, we expect sales to decline in the range between 8% and 11.5%, which includes roughly a 220 basis point currency headwind. We expect operating margin in the range between negative 3.5% to negative 5.5% and a loss per share in the range between $1 and $0.83, which includes a restructuring charge of $0.15 per share.
Let me take a moment to talk about liquidity and cash flow. With the amendments we made to our credit facility, we have additional flexibility to operate during our peak working capital periods. Our recent declines in EBITDA are putting additional pressure on our available capital. However, with our new facility now in place, we expect that it, coupled with our cash generation, will provide us with sufficient resources to manage throughout the year and over the life of the facility.
As a management team, we are highly focused on managing our capital carefully and prudently and are working to improve our position. We are now refocusing both our CapEx and our restructuring investments on those initiatives that drive near-term cash returns. We have opportunities to monetize a modest level of international unencumbered assets.
We're continuing to drive our investments in inventory down ending Q1 with nearly $60 million less inventory than we had a year ago, and we are focused on other areas to optimize our investment in working capital.
Our goal for the year is to generate overall free cash flow similar to last year's $144 million. There are headwinds against that goal. The biggest of which are lower operating earnings and higher interest rates.
At our higher level of expectations, those represent roughly an $85 million headwind, including our restructuring investments and the effects of currencies. We have significant offsets to those headwinds. Based on our updated plans, we'll deploy $30 million less CapEx than last year.
Given this year's lower earnings, we expect we'll pay roughly $20 million less in taxes this year. And our goal is to leverage our efforts to manage working capital in inventory and in other areas to bridge the gap. We expect that our cash build this year will primarily be in international markets. While it remains our goal to reduce our debt position that will be challenging this year given that the majority of our restructuring investments will require U.S. cash, limiting our ability to repay our debt, which is U.S. based.
Therefore, we continue to expect to end the year with a relatively similar debt position as last year. Our ability to generate cash flow remains strong even in a disruptive environment. Our net debt position, currently roughly $300 million, improved $180 million in fiscal 2016, and we expect it to substantially improve again this year.

Our capital challenges are twofold. First, the majority of our cash flow was generated overseas, which creates a substantial tax consequence to fully use that cash to repay existing U.S. debt.
Secondly, given that our debt is concentrated with banks; our availability is a significant function of our historical EBITDA, which has been recently declining, including a significant impact from currencies. We remain focused on solutions to mitigate these issues, including diversifying our capital structure, both in terms of markets and tenor.
And with that, we'll open up the call to your questions. Please limit yourself to one single-part question, so that we can get to everyone and give them a chance to ask a question. If you have further questions, please re-queue and we'll get to as many questions as time permits.
Question-and-Answer Session
Operator
Our first question is from Ed Yruma of KeyBanc Capital Markets. Your line is open.
Edward J. Yruma - Pacific Crest Securities
Hey, guys. Thanks for taking my question. I know you indicated that sell-in on wearables was a little bit short of plans, I guess any specificity there would be helpful.
I know you gave some color around the Fossil lift for wearables, but how did the Michael Kors wearable performance shake out? And was some of the weaker sell-in due to the potential for orders that maybe got pushed out toward the back end of the year? Thank you.
Gregory A. McKelvey - Fossil Group, Inc.
Yes. We'll talk about wearables performance on three levels, sales, margins and product delivery. For sales, we mentioned Q1 was below budget, still strong growth of over 400% and was 7% of our total sales.
If you look at the factors for why under-budget, we're determining that wearables are a bit more of a seasonal business than traditional watches, so we should expect our mix to be a bit lower than in the front end of the year and higher as a percent of total business in the back half.
We ended up pushing out a lot of our marketing in Q1, so there's very limited marketing and most of that is now aligned against Fossil and Kors and the other brands that we're launching in Q2 and Q3.
And then it took a bit longer to solidify our expanded distribution through license or approval. So those are now largely in place and aligned with our updated sales goals through the year.
So that's the summary, nothing specific around Kors. Those products are still performing very well. And for the rest of performance on wearables, margins are coming in better. So as you know, we've been – I mentioned on the last call, relentlessly working with our supply base on driving cost out. Those plans aren't fully solidified, but we've got line of sight to those margins improvements accruing sooner than we had originally forecasted. And then Q1 was – has been a significant amount of work as well on delivering on all of the product launches for the back half of the year, which remain on track.
Edward J. Yruma - Pacific Crest Securities
Thanks so much.
Operator
Thank you. Our next question is from Omar Saad of Evercore ISI. Your line is open.
Omar Saad - Evercore Group LLC
Thank you. I wanted to ask a follow-up on the wearables category. Could you talk about your inventory mix and how you are planning the business, traditional fashion watches versus wearables? Where you stand now? Where you expect that to be later in the year?
And at retail, is there still a lot of traditional fashion watch inventory that needs to be worked through that's driving the promotions that are pressuring the gross margins a little bit as you try to kind of clear the desk for all the wearable launches in the second half? Thanks.
Dennis R. Secor - Fossil Group, Inc.
Yeah. No, I would say, we – you heard us say on the call our inventories are down 9%. The team here has been really focused on managing that well, within that 9% decline, we've been able to significantly invest in wearables, which is going to drive our growth and reduce our investments in the traditional business. So we're accomplishing a number of objectives, both in terms of positioning us well for growth and managing our capital.

We think that the inventories are very clean. We've been reducing those inventories significantly. Our clearance this quarter was roughly flat to last – or a year ago rather, which has put some – a little bit of a headwind into the margins. But very pleased with the inventory position we're coming out of the quarter with.
Gregory A. McKelvey - Fossil Group, Inc.
In discounting, you're seeing, Omar, is what we actually referenced in our last call where we've got sharp opening price points to drive volume, particularly on Fossil. You'll continue to see that sharp price points with stepped-up marketing and dramatically improved process, I think that's the right recipe to drive this business.
Omar Saad - Evercore Group LLC
Got it. Thanks. Good luck.
Kosta N. Kartsotis - Fossil Group, Inc.
Thank you.
Operator
Thank you. Our next question is from Oliver Chen of Cowen & Company. Your line is open.
Oliver Chen - Cowen and Company, LLC
Hi. Thank you. As we look ahead, when should we expect the decline in traditional watches to stop or grow in terms of will the compares ease or are you feeling like there's the initiatives you're putting forward will start to drive demand or will that decline for the foreseeable future?
And on the wearables side, can you just brief us on the marketplace, because I'm feeling like there's a lot of promotional intensity that could be out of your control in the marketplace. So how will you manage margins in that context and what can you do to try to manage a healthy demand profile on some items in terms of making sure that the margin march happens over time? Thank you.
Dennis R. Secor - Fossil Group, Inc.
Sure. Let me take the first part of that in terms of the sales trajectory. We've said for a while that our biggest challenge is really near-term visibility. You go back to last year, and we were fundamentally operating in a declining market when we were only operating in the traditional watch market. And coming out of the fourth quarter, when we had a strong showing of our wearables performance.
We're now in a growing wrist device market that is 30%-plus bigger than that standalone traditional watch market. And that growth in that combined wrist device market is being fueled by connected watches.
But we don't yet have all of our brands on their platform. We haven't fully developed the distribution for connected, so we're still in the earlier phases of that part of the evolution. So the near-term challenge is continuing to try to sequence the growth in connected against the headwinds in traditional.
Connected again in the first quarter, which as Greg mentioned, is probably the least impactful quarter given the seasonality of that product, but it did drive double-digit improvement in the trajectories of Kors, very nearly the same in Fossil. So we're still seeing that wearables can be the catalyst to drive growth in the category. But specifically for 2017, the first quarter was our toughest compare. Remember, we had last year sell-in that we were up against, we've got fewer stores, we got currencies, but we do expect as we bring more connected on to the platform that see accelerating growth. Our second quarter guide is a sequential improvement to the first, and we expect that to accelerate as we move through the back half of the year.
Gregory A. McKelvey - Fossil Group, Inc.
And more specifically on your point around discounting and how we're seeing the market, on hybrids, I guess, I responded to this with Omar, and this is really about our – the price points that our elasticity curves are telling us drive volumes, were then translated into lower cost, which hit the margin profile we're looking for the year.
Out of Q1, we're doing better than we thought. We're getting cost out even further and so we're on hybrids feeling good about our ability to continue to grow that business profitably. And that's really our own – there's nobody else driving the significant scale in that category like we are.

On the smartwatch, I think the indicators we look for there is that we're still seeing very strong sell-through for our higher price point products with Michael Kors and the Access watch. We don't have significant discounting on those. We're still seeing that and then we're again intentionally using a high, low strategy on Fossil to drive strong opening price points and volume. So we are – I think, performing well in the marketplace and are effectively on track for our margin expectations.
Kosta N. Kartsotis - Fossil Group, Inc.
I would just add that we're perceiving significantly demand in wearables. If you look at IDC's latest research, it shows that the smartwatch business last year was about $19 billion, on its way to $35 billion by 2020. And we are – through our new distribution, through CE channels and all our existing distribution, we're seeing pretty significant demand out there that bodes well for our future in wearables.
Dennis R. Secor - Fossil Group, Inc.
You know to kind of punctuate that. We still believe very strongly what we said last time in terms of the long-term that we have the opportunity to drive back to operating margins in those low-teens, driven by three major initiatives to return to a modest level of growth. And we think connected is showing us that we have the opportunity to do that.
We've got to deliver New World Fossil, and we are well on our way to delivering the 2017 part of that and connected margins was the third. And you heard Greg say that, we have advanced the ball faster against that initiative this year already. So we certainly continue to believe that, that is an achievable goal for us.
Oliver Chen - Cowen and Company, LLC
Thanks for that. That's great.
Kosta N. Kartsotis - Fossil Group, Inc.
Thank you.
Operator
Thank you. Our next question is from Erinn Murphy of Piper Jaffray. Your line is open.
Erinn E. Murphy - Piper Jaffray & Co.
Great. Thanks. Good afternoon. Just a question on wholesale partner destocking, has that – traditional watches – has that trend accelerated? Is it flat sequentially or is it still declining? And then I guess just yesterday with Coach's announcement of the acquisition of Kate Spade. Does that change anything with the licensing relationship you have with Kate, I just don't know if there's change in control in that license that could impact, I think, it's through 2025, so just curious on that? Thanks.
Dennis R. Secor - Fossil Group, Inc.
Sure, on the wholesale business, I mean, overall, our traditional business performed pretty much in line with our expectations. Overall, we were a little bit stronger than we anticipated in the international market, a little bit behind in the U.S. but not a material change in the trajectory. So we had expected this and as we – again, we delivered our sales, in fact, into the overall traditional watch business we were actually a little bit ahead of our goals for the quarter.
Kosta N. Kartsotis - Fossil Group, Inc.
And as for Kate Spade, as you mentioned, we have a contract with them through 2025 and we are looking forward to working closely with the Kate Spade team and we're launching wearables this year in Kate Spade.
The brand has been very successful on our portfolio. We think it's got a long-term future that could be very significant. So looking forward to working with the new team.
Erinn E. Murphy - Piper Jaffray & Co.
And so there's no issue with change in control with Coach now being the owner of Kate and just know how that looked?
Kosta N. Kartsotis - Fossil Group, Inc.
No, there's no change of control, either way in the contract.
Erinn E. Murphy - Piper Jaffray & Co.
Okay. And then if I could just sneak one in on leathers, it was pretty challenging in the quarter, down 21%. Could you just elaborate what you are seeing and it's been obviously a very promotional category for several brands out there, but kind of how should we think about that trend throughout the balance of the year? Thank you.

Kosta N. Kartsotis - Fossil Group, Inc.
Yes, I think it's several things. First of all, I'd say we've had some product misses in our own assortment and we've been working with a design consultant that's been very helpful. We're kind of changing the entire profile of it. We've got a lot of new ideas, new materials and we're actually going to do some pre-testing of all those things on consumer panels, online consumer panels. So we're going out at it with a totally new approach.
The other thing, as you mentioned, I think, the business has been tough overall. I think the latest NPD numbers for fourth quarter show that I think the total handbag business in United States was down 19%. So the market's tough, but we do think that with our position and our own stores and website, we're going to be able to have an opportunity long-term as we change the product and go after.
One thing we are seeing, I think, from our Q is we're seeing a younger customer come into our store to buy wearable technology, I think we can leverage that into handbags. So we're looking forward to improving the business and moving forward with a larger opportunity in handbags.
Erinn E. Murphy - Piper Jaffray & Co.
Thank you.
Operator
Thank you. Our next question is from Simeon Siegel of Nomura/Instinet. Your line is open.
Simeon Avram Siegel - Nomura Securities
Thanks. Good afternoon, guys. Can you quantify any cannibalization you may or may not be seeing, wearable versus traditionals? Dennis, I think when you said tripling wearables, any way to quantify how much would be incremental volume versus maybe a transfer from the traditional. And then just how do you view the sales trajectory of the wearable and traditionals over this year embedded within your guide? Thanks.
Gregory A. McKelvey - Fossil Group, Inc.
Okay. On cannibalization, I think there's four things to frame. First off, we don't give exact cannibalization numbers, but four ways to think about it. One, we're seeing the right consumer dynamics. So smartwatches in particular, despite smartwatches are in general a new customer that's coming in and they're high-quality customer. So, we're seeing generally younger, higher average basket size, so a lot of incrementality there.
On hybrids, generally it's an existing traditional watch customer but there's a willingness to pay for more features and trade up to a higher average unit retail product. Second, we're seeing significant comp improvements from wearables. So it tells us there is significant amount of incrementality overall.
Third, we're in this relentless pursuit to drive cost down quickly to get to the point where we're not going to care as cannibalization occurs, because we're selling higher average unit retail products at good enough margin to the point where it's accretive wherever the customer goes and where we've got line of sight to getting there.
And then fourth, we have, with these differentiated products that are difficult to do with any reasonable scale with true branding and design, like we're doing on a global basis. With those advantages, we believe that we are not only transforming our business and unit volume in total, but we are competing in a much larger addressable market and we'll be taking share, significant share over time in both traditional watches and our expanded addressable market that includes wearables.
Dennis R. Secor - Fossil Group, Inc.
Yes, and just on the progression then through the year, traditional versus connected, the way we see that, as I mentioned just a minute ago, the traditional business overall as a portfolio, but generally performs a little bit ahead of our expectations. As we sort of trended out, we see sort of the upper end of our guidance, there was existing trends we're seeing sort of persisting very modest initiatives that we can capitalize and some emerging trends that we're seeing.

And then at the lower end, we make an assumption that we see a further step-down in those historical trends beyond what we've already seen and observed in our historical data. So that's sort of a general assumption around the traditional business.
On the connected business, it's much more of an accelerated growth, what we're seeing – the things to think about – we're talking about increasing our penetration significantly in wearables this year that's going to be more back-loaded. We're seasonalizing the business that we have during the first quarter, we're opening a lot of new doors this year. We're bringing new brands on to the platform, more display watches. We're assuming that we are going to see some better performance.
We got better product coming in the market, slimmer product, which is going to attract new consumers, better technology, there continues to be enhanced awareness around the category that's being held by the competition, as well as the investments that we're making in marketing, better price product assortment, sharper price points and in fact, some of the recent data just published suggest that the wearables market is actually likely to be larger this year than last year. The latest estimate went from $17 billion to $19 billion in 2017. So there's a lot of work to be done, but there's a lot of fuel in the tank to drive those numbers.
Kosta N. Kartsotis - Fossil Group, Inc.
And it's really the investment in innovation and in our experience innovation always drives sales results and gets consumers excited in wrist devices. If you look at the overall watch business last year, it was minus 9%. And we're in a situation now where there's $2 billion colliding (45:22) wearables and watches together. It's a very exciting prospect to bring new consumers in there that may have not worn a watch before and to really disrupt the industry with innovation we think is very exciting.
Dennis R. Secor - Fossil Group, Inc.
Yes, and just to complete the point on how we're thinking about guidance. So what I described in connected more aligns with the upper end of our range. And then there is, obviously, execution risk, there's a lot of stuff to get done. So, the lower end of our range assumes we don't fully execute everything in that plan.
Simeon Avram Siegel - Nomura Securities
Okay, thanks. Very helpful. And then if I can just for quick clarification, to your point about the balance sheet. Do you expect the incremental interest to go away this year or does that recur? And then just can you help anything that you are embedding for the other income line within the full year and the Q2 guides?
Dennis R. Secor - Fossil Group, Inc.
The interest – so with the new amended and extended facility, we had anticipated already in this year that there will be a higher interest. So we already embedded that into our guidance.
There is an acceleration feature as we move through time, one later this year and then another next year. Whether it would be a further increase in interest expense, that's subject to – that would kick in if we don't pay down the existing $185 million term loan that we have outstanding today.
And then with respect to the other – what we did say in the prepared remarks is that based on all of our assumptions in the current exchange rate environment that the net below the line kind of currency activity should be roughly similar to last year.
Simeon Avram Siegel - Nomura Securities
Great. Thanks a lot, guys. Best of luck for the rest of the year.
Gregory A. McKelvey - Fossil Group, Inc.
Thank you.
Operator
Thank you. Our next question is from Anna Andreeva of Oppenheimer. Your line is open.
Anna Andreeva - Oppenheimer & Co., Inc.
Great. Thanks so much. Couple of questions for us. I guess on wearables, can you elaborate what distribution you guys weren't able to get during the quarter? Was that U.S. or international? And should we think this is mostly across the CE channel or at department stores? And I guess are you expecting a catch-up in distribution as we go through the year?

And then secondly, you mentioned there was a marketing expenses shift out of 1Q into 2Q and 3Q. What was the dollar amount? Thanks.
Kosta N. Kartsotis - Fossil Group, Inc.
We actually slowed down our distribution of wearables to some locations early this year, basically because we didn't – we were low on stock on our best-selling styles. We were chasing those, and we didn't feel it's prudent to really to go to a lot of new distribution until we had the full assortment, including the best-selling stock.
So we've largely corrected that. So a lot of that's going out right now. So we do expect that we will have a very significant additional distribution this year, not only through our existing channel, but through CE channels, websites, et cetera, so we're getting into position to quantify that year, last year, with the first quarter being the real first initial push for wearables, that we had a concentration, a significant amount of our marketing investment that landed in the fourth quarter.
This year, we see the timing we're investing, less in the first, Greg just explained that to you, more in the second launches coming into the late second and early third, more in the third relative to last year and then that turned into fourth. So you see the concentration moving away year-over-year from the first into fourth to the second and the third, we didn't quantify that.
One other comment I'd make on advertising is that, as we mentioned, we've done a great job I think of reducing SG&A, including the fact that we've absorbed all our Misfit and wearables expenses into our SG&A and still have a smaller number. But we largely have not touched advertising.
Our advertising is still going out pretty much the same that we had last couple of years. A lot of it is focused on wearables and not just at all types of media, but also a lot of training, point of sale and a lot of additional distribution, et cetera. So our marketing largely has not been affected as much as some of our other expenses.
Operator
Thank you. Our next question is from Dana Telsey of Telsey Advisory Group. Your line is open.
Dana Telsey - Telsey Advisory Group
Good afternoon, everyone. As you think about and you chatted about the accelerating promotional environment, can you just qualitatively, are you seeing that across all channels? Is it more one category than another? And what drove the acceleration more recently? Is it less traffic? What are you seeing out there to put your arms around it? Thank you.
Dennis R. Secor - Fossil Group, Inc.
Yes, where we saw it principally was in our outlets, which has been a trend for the last several quarters (50:11).
Operator
Sir, you may respond to the question now.
Kosta N. Kartsotis - Fossil Group, Inc.
Can you please repeat the question? Operator, can you please repeat the question?
Operator
Yes, sir. Dana Telsey's line is still open.
Gregory A. McKelvey - Fossil Group, Inc.
Dana, would you like to repeat your question, please? We'll come back to that one. Operator...
Dana Telsey - Telsey Advisory Group
Hi, can you hear me?
Gregory A. McKelvey - Fossil Group, Inc.
We can. Thank you, Dana.
Dana Telsey - Telsey Advisory Group
Oh, good. I was just asking about as you think about the different channels and the promotional levels, what are you seeing by channel, is it different by channel, is it different by category with this accelerating promotions and what's changed more recently? Thank you.
Dennis R. Secor - Fossil Group, Inc.
Yes, I don't think the trend has continued. I think it's just the intensity, the level of promotion that we need to execute to drive the sales. So I think it is just another symptom of the same issue that's been recurring. It's always difficult to [Technical Difficulty] (53:36 – 54:20).
Operator

You can speak, sir.
Dennis R. Secor - Fossil Group, Inc.
We haven't heard a question after Dana's.
Operator
Yes, sir. Our next question is from Randy Konik of Jefferies. Your line is open.
Randal J. Konik - Jefferies LLC
Can you hear me now?
Dennis R. Secor - Fossil Group, Inc.
We can.
Randal J. Konik - Jefferies LLC
Hey, guys. How are you? So, thanks for taking my question. I know there's some technical difficulties here. I feel like a lot of the call has been focused on the wearable product evolution, which I think is great.
Although, right now, it's obviously only 7% of the business. So, just kind of what – how can we get comfort, I think what the market's looking for is how do we kind of think about the traditional watch business, and where those unit volumes kind of start to bottom out and why? And kind of walk us through your thought process on that scenario?
And then I guess just a follow-up around distribution, it sounded like you said like look, we're looking to more CE channels, et cetera. And you did a good job of reducing your store count. I guess what I'm trying to get towards is what does the distribution footprint need to look like as the product strategy is morphed and the market itself is changed? So I'm just trying to get some help on that traditional watch market, where does it stabilize? I think that's the most important part of the story and then just the distribution angle around it. Thanks.
Kosta N. Kartsotis - Fossil Group, Inc.
Well, as we mentioned before, one of the issues we have is the lack of visibility and exactly when we'll see the bottom in the traditional watch business. Just overall, our number one objective is to continue to gain share in the watch business. We just think the way to do that right now is with technology.
So we have identified several trends in traditional watches that we are distorting right now to go after it. But the biggest trend that we're going after which is clear to us and the demand is all there is in wearables.
So if you take our existing distribution where the stores that we sell to have all embraced the idea of wearable technology, they still have a big business obviously in traditional watches, and we're putting new materials and new ideas and new thoughts in there as we migrate towards a larger number of wearables.
It is bringing younger customers in the store, largely haven't worn watches before. So we're starting to see more relevancy in the watch business. In addition to that, we've expanded to sell to CE channel, which are – most of those CE channels are selling display smartwatches and hybrids. And we're seeing very good sales across the board in that channel.
So I would say the entire industry is really seeing the two businesses collide, wearables and traditional watches. It's giving us additional channels, it's giving our existing distribution additional customers coming into the store and it's giving us a larger addressable market.
So I think all in all, we just got to play through it. We do not have the visibility and when the traditional watch business will level off. But what we do know is when we have wearables in a certain brand, whether it's Kors or Fossil, that the comps are dramatically different when we have wearables and traditional watches in the same environment. And that we think will accelerate as time goes on.
Randal J. Konik - Jefferies LLC
And then just may I ask then, Dennis, when you gave the annual revenue guidance or the updated revenue guidance for the year, is there a way we can get the assumption of what the traditional watch business is assumed to be declining at? And how that compares to the first quarter trend?
Dennis R. Secor - Fossil Group, Inc.
Well, we've given you the overall – the watch decline in the release. We haven't disclosed the specifics around traditional versus connected. But again, the way we view just the trends on that traditional business is to continue at a decline, at the pace we've been seeing on the upper end and then at the lower end to expect some level of further erosion. That is largely the big part of the change in the – or the width of the range. There's really two risks identified in that range, it's that further step down in the traditional business and then execution risk in delivering our connected agenda this year.

Randal J. Konik - Jefferies LLC
Understood. Thank you.
Dennis R. Secor - Fossil Group, Inc.
You bet.
Operator
Thank you. Our next question is from Ike Boruchow of Wells Fargo. Your line is open.
Ike Boruchow - Wells Fargo Securities LLC
Hey, sorry, guys. Can you hear me?
Dennis R. Secor - Fossil Group, Inc.
We can.
Ike Boruchow - Wells Fargo Securities LLC
Sorry about that. I just wanted to go back to the question that Simeon asked about cannibalization. I mean, the only reason I want to ask you again is, clearly the macro is tough out there, but the traditional watch business took a pretty – it took a big step back in Q4 and it's kind of remained in that run rate in Q1 and that coincides with the launch of wearables.
So, I'm just kind of curious, like, whatever work you've done around cannibalization within the traditional watch business, can you share anything with us? Because I'm really trying to understand, if you sell more wearables, are you sure that you're cannibalizing your high margin existing watch business while you do that and scale that business? Just how do you balance both of those businesses together given the different margin dynamics?
Dennis R. Secor - Fossil Group, Inc.
Yes, I mean – let's see. We don't have specific data that we're able to share with you. But, I mean, one way to look at it is kind of refer to what I said earlier about the change in the market. So up until last year, we were operating the market that was declining because we were limited to that traditional watch market.
There were other choices that consumers could make in terms of technology. Our challenge was we couldn't get that customer. The other choice that the customer was making, we did not benefit it.
So, in a certain sense, you might say that over the last couple of years really arguably into the back half of last year, we were being – using the term loosely, sort of, cannibalized by others in the marketplace.
Now we are in a position, early stages though because we don't have all of our brands in the platform, but now we are in a position to take advantage of that preference from some of the consumers, moving away from traditional watches into connected watches. And that we believe will grow as we bring more products into the market as we bring better products into the market, more brands into the market, expand our distribution, we will be in a better position to win that customer when a year ago when we didn't have – we virtually had no offering in connect, so we didn't win that. We've changed our competitive position significantly in the last 12 months.
Ike Boruchow - Wells Fargo Securities LLC
Thank you.
Operator
Thank you. Our last question is from Heather Balsky of Bank of America. Your line is open.
Heather N. Balsky - Bank of America Merrill Lynch
Hi, thank you for taking my question. I was wondering if you could just talk about New World Fossil and just remind us, what is the split of the 200 million of operating margin opportunity in terms of SG&A and the benefit to gross margin? And then you talked about accelerating some of the cost benefits into 2017. What are those benefits that you think you can accelerate? Thanks.
Dennis R. Secor - Fossil Group, Inc.
Sure. So, we haven't specifically broken out all the components, but what we said is that our goal was to invest. Initially, we thought it would be about $150 million in restructuring charges. That will likely be lower as we've reduced some of the store closure plans. But that was largely then to drive a portfolio of improvements that will go into a number of buckets, the total of which is roughly $200 million and it included optimizing and gaining efficiencies in our infrastructure and our organizational structure, improving our ability to leverage our volumes in both our direct and indirect sourcing, designing with a better view to the feature set that a customer was willing to pay for to ultimately eliminate features that just add costs but really don't motivate the consumer to buy. And then focusing on category management more tightly, looking at our SKU counts, reducing them and become much more efficient with the way we build our product plant.

So that whole portfolio is designed to deliver roughly $200 million of profit improvements over the life of the program. The core organization is laser-focused on this.
We did a lot of work last year and much of that work is going to drive the benefit that we're seeing in 2017. Based on the way we've measured, we think that we will deliver that 40% of that goal in 2017 and then some of the margin benefits take a little longer to cycle through because you have to deal with the design calendars and production calendars before those benefits actually flow through a P&L. But we think we've made a lot of progress, and we're on good track to deliver.
Heather N. Balsky - Bank of America Merrill Lynch
Great. Thank you. And just one quick question in terms of your wholesale sales, in terms of department store closures, how much of an impact do you think you saw in the first quarter? And how are you thinking about the rest of the year?
Kosta N. Kartsotis - Fossil Group, Inc.
I would say it's relatively small. As you know, we're closing some of the small doors. We're seeing some of those sales obviously migrate to online, and we don't really expect through this year to be a significant number. In addition to that, of course, we're adding a lot of additional distribution that will offset some of that. So we don't think it's a big impact to us.
Heather N. Balsky - Bank of America Merrill Lynch
Okay. Thank you very much.
Operator
Thank you. At this time, I'd like to turn it back to Mr. Secor for closing remarks.
Dennis R. Secor - Fossil Group, Inc.
Thank you very much. First, let me say that we understand there was some technical difficulties on the call. But we'll be sure that the transcript includes any of those comments that might have not been clear on the line, so everybody can benefit from that. So with that, thank you, again for joining us today. Plan to speak to you again on our next earnings call in August. Thank you very much.
Operator
Ladies and gentlemen, thank you for your participation in today's conference. This concludes your program. You may now disconnect. Everyone, have a great day.
Copyright policy: All transcripts on this site are the copyright of Seeking Alpha. However, we view them as an important resource for bloggers and journalists, and are excited to contribute to the democratization of financial information on the Internet. (Until now investors have had to pay thousands of dollars in subscription fees for transcripts.) So our reproduction policy is as follows: You may quote up to 400 words of any transcript on the condition that you attribute the transcript to Seeking Alpha and either link to the original transcript or to www.SeekingAlpha.com. All other use is prohibited.
THE INFORMATION CONTAINED HERE IS A TEXTUAL REPRESENTATION OF THE APPLICABLE COMPANY'S CONFERENCE CALL, CONFERENCE PRESENTATION OR OTHER AUDIO PRESENTATION, AND WHILE EFFORTS ARE MADE TO PROVIDE AN ACCURATE TRANSCRIPTION, THERE MAY BE MATERIAL ERRORS, OMISSIONS, OR INACCURACIES IN THE REPORTING OF THE SUBSTANCE OF THE AUDIO PRESENTATIONS. IN NO WAY DOES SEEKING ALPHA ASSUME ANY RESPONSIBILITY FOR ANY INVESTMENT OR OTHER DECISIONS MADE BASED UPON THE INFORMATION PROVIDED ON THIS WEB SITE OR IN ANY TRANSCRIPT. USERS ARE ADVISED TO REVIEW THE APPLICABLE COMPANY'S AUDIO PRESENTATION ITSELF AND THE APPLICABLE COMPANY'S SEC FILINGS BEFORE MAKING ANY INVESTMENT OR OTHER DECISIONS.
If you have any additional questions about our online transcripts, please contact us at: transcripts@seekingalpha.com. Thank you!
About this article:ExpandTagged: Consumer Goods, Recreational Goods, Other, TranscriptsError in this transcript? Let us know.Contact us to add your company to our coverage or use transcripts in your business.Learn more about Seeking Alpha transcripts here.Follow SA Transcripts and get email alertsSearch TranscriptThis transcriptFindAll transcriptsFindCompare To:All FOSL TranscriptsOther Companies in this sector





Consumer Goods and Retail Stocks | Seeking AlphaSign in / Join NowGO»Consumer Goods and Retail StocksTime To Be More Tolerant For This Growth Dairy Stock?SAPIF• Today, 5:26 AM • Brad MacIntoshEstimating ANFI's FY 2018 Margins And EarningsANFI• Today, 12:49 AM • Sven Carlin•3 CommentsNorthsight Capital Makes Cannabis Stocks Look BadNCAP• Yesterday, 3:59 PM • Debra Borchardt•2 CommentsCoca-Cola: Where Does It End?KO• Yesterday, 3:04 PM • Josh Arnold•12 CommentsPhilip Morris Q2 Earnings Summary: What You Need To KnowPM• Yesterday, 1:52 PM • ValueAnalyst•22 CommentsTesla's South Australia Battery Deal Shows Why The Company Is Not An Energy CompanyTSLA• Yesterday, 1:30 PM • EnerTuition•159 CommentsSkechers Looks Good Into 2018SKX• Yesterday, 1:19 PM • L&F Capital Management•6 CommentsDaily Insider Ratings Round Up 7/20/17: NAV, OLBK, SKIS, SHLO, TWNNAV• Yesterday, 12:38 PM • InsiderInsightsAutomakers Invest In Nauto's $159 Million Financing RoundGM• Yesterday, 12:37 PM • Donovan Jones•1 CommentAutonomous Driving Leaps Forward, Leaving Tesla BehindTSLA• Yesterday, 12:14 PM • Donn Bailey•207 CommentsHotel California: Why Tesla Can Check Out Any Time It Likes, But It Can Never LeaveTSLA• Yesterday, 12:13 PM • Trapping Value•136 CommentsVanguard Prepares To Destroy The S&P 500 AgainVDC• Yesterday, 11:02 AM • Colorado Wealth Management Fund•16 CommentsBurberry: Still Undervalued As It Builds Up To A Potentially Improved 2018?Editors' Pick • BURBY• Yesterday, 10:00 AM • Dividend Drive•1 CommentAltria: Dividend Is Safe...For NowMO• Yesterday, 9:11 AM • Josh Arnold•29 CommentsThe Dividend Stock Bubble Has Claimed Another VictimPM• Yesterday, 9:04 AM • Josh Arnold•26 CommentsValue Trap: Adient Plc's Contradicting Growth OutlookADNT• Yesterday, 8:19 AM • Centaur Investments•2 CommentsUnilever Up 43% YTD With More To ComeUL, UN• Yesterday, 7:25 AM • Iron Value•9 CommentsFaurecia SA ACT 2017 Q1 - Results - Earnings Call SlidesFURCF• Yesterday, 6:31 AM • SA TranscriptsAs Sales Plunge, GM Might Cancel 6 Car ModelsGM• Yesterday, 6:10 AM • Wolf Richter•61 CommentsSkechers Shows Retail Footwear LivesSKX• Yesterday, 1:33 AM • Quad 7 Capital•14 CommentsA Contrarian Vote In Favor Of McCormick's AcquisitionMKC• Thu, Jul. 20, 8:21 PM • Vince Martin•18 CommentsTesla Solar Roof, The Odds Of Surviving Home Solar MarketTSLA• Thu, Jul. 20, 4:57 PM • X. Dong Wang•98 CommentsWhere Are The Solar Roofs?TSLA• Thu, Jul. 20, 4:08 PM • Galileo Russell•179 CommentsA. Schulman: How Did I Not See This Train Wreck Coming?SHLM• Thu, Jul. 20, 3:31 PM • Quad 7 CapitalCampbell Soup (CPB) Investor Presentation - SlideshowCPB• Thu, Jul. 20, 2:35 PM • SA TranscriptsCampbell Soup (CPB) Investor Presentation - SlideshowCPB• Thu, Jul. 20, 2:35 PM • SA TranscriptsBunge (BG) Updates On Competitiveness Program - SlideshowBG• Thu, Jul. 20, 2:22 PM • SA TranscriptsEthan Allen Interiors (ETH) Investor Presentation - SlideshowETH• Thu, Jul. 20, 2:00 PM • SA TranscriptsBMW Leads Investment In Used-Car Marketplace ShiftBMWYY• Thu, Jul. 20, 1:50 PM • Donovan JonesTilly's: The Best Of A Bad SectorTLYS• Thu, Jul. 20, 1:32 PM • Vince MartinChurch & Dwight: Waterpik Deal Looks Decent; Valuation Remains FullCHD• Thu, Jul. 20, 12:17 PM • The Value Investor•5 CommentsMcCormick - 'Winner' Of Reckitt Benckiser's Food Business AuctionMKC• Thu, Jul. 20, 11:55 AM • The Value Investor•13 CommentsUnder Armour Will Outlast Negative NewsUAA• Thu, Jul. 20, 11:43 AM • Brent A. Miller•11 CommentsThe Only Detriment For Philip MorrisPM• Thu, Jul. 20, 11:18 AM • Jonathan Weber•14 CommentsPhilip Morris: Let It FallPM• Thu, Jul. 20, 10:25 AM • Quad 7 Capital•25 CommentsPhilip Morris International Inc. 2017 Q2 - Results - Earnings Call SlidesPM• Thu, Jul. 20, 10:20 AM • SA Transcripts•4 CommentsPhilip Morris Quits SmokingPM• Thu, Jul. 20, 10:00 AM • ValueAnalyst•52 CommentsCampbell Soup: Red Flags For A Red LabelCPB• Thu, Jul. 20, 9:43 AM • Dan Stringer•10 CommentsPolaris Industries Inc. 2017 Q2 - Results - Earnings Call SlidesPII• Thu, Jul. 20, 9:23 AM • SA TranscriptsWABCO Holdings Inc. 2017 Q2 - Results - Earnings Call SlidesWBC• Thu, Jul. 20, 9:03 AM • SA TranscriptsUnilever Plc 2017 Q2 - Results - Earnings Call SlidesUL• Thu, Jul. 20, 3:37 AM • SA TranscriptsWould Tesla Acquire Faraday Future And Lucid Motors?TSLA• Wed, Jul. 19, 7:59 PM • Anton Wahlman•89 CommentsTesla Ownership: T. Rowe Price Sells, What's Next?TSLA• Wed, Jul. 19, 6:08 PM • ValueAnalyst•260 CommentsSan Miguel: Riding The Political Waves In The PhilippinesSMGBY• Wed, Jul. 19, 4:45 PM • Nick Cox•2 CommentsZEV Credits: They're Real And They're Spectacular!TSLA• Wed, Jul. 19, 4:24 PM • Kurt B. Feierabend•123 CommentsNow Is Not The Time To Buy TeslaTSLA• Wed, Jul. 19, 3:44 PM • Isaac Tang•68 CommentsImitation Is The Sincerest Form Of FlatteryVLKAY• Wed, Jul. 19, 3:33 PM • Life Sciences Millennial•1 CommentDo New Tesla Board Additions Signal Big Changes Ahead?TSLA• Wed, Jul. 19, 11:38 AM • Donn Bailey•137 CommentsTiffany & Company Is Outclassed By Signet Jewelers And MovadoMOV• Wed, Jul. 19, 10:50 AM • DJ Habig•3 CommentsValue in TAPTAP• Wed, Jul. 19, 8:38 AM • Tim Gruppi•15 CommentsCampbell Soup Company - Why Legacy Products Will Die A Slow DeathCPB• Wed, Jul. 19, 8:30 AM • James Sands•6 CommentsNeenah Paper: Well Positioned In A Niche Premium MarketNP• Wed, Jul. 19, 8:17 AM • Dustin Barnett•4 CommentsDiebold Inc. 2017 Q2 - Results - Earnings Call SlidesDBD• Wed, Jul. 19, 8:09 AM • SA TranscriptsTesla Investors Swallow The Blue PillTSLA• Wed, Jul. 19, 6:31 AM • Montana Skeptic•546 CommentsProcter & Gamble: Let The Fun BeginPG• Wed, Jul. 19, 5:58 AM • Activist Stocks•11 CommentsProcter & Gamble: Can The Supertanker Be Turned?PG• Wed, Jul. 19, 4:35 AM • John Abbink•5 CommentsVolvo AB ADR B 2017 Q2 - Results - Earnings Call SlidesVOLVY• Wed, Jul. 19, 3:22 AM • SA TranscriptsWhy I Changed My Mind About GentexGNTX• Wed, Jul. 19, 3:10 AM • Samuel Smith•8 CommentsHarley-Davidson Spirals Down, Announces U.S. Layoffs, Builds Factory In ThailandHOG• Wed, Jul. 19, 1:44 AM • Wolf Richter•32 CommentsEcolab: A High Quality Dividend Aristocrat Held By Bill GatesECL• Wed, Jul. 19, 1:42 AM • Simply Safe Dividends•12 CommentsHarley-Davidson, Inc. 2017 Q2 - Results - Earnings Call SlidesHOG• Wed, Jul. 19, 12:57 AM • SA TranscriptsMolson Coors: Brewing Up A Comeback?TAP• Tue, Jul. 18, 9:43 PM • Benjamin Handler•12 CommentsCoty: What The Numbers SayCOTY• Tue, Jul. 18, 9:19 PM • Casacampo•3 CommentsVolkswagen Plans To Make Electric Cars Competitive On Price: Watch Out TeslaVLKAF, VLKAY, VLKPY• Tue, Jul. 18, 9:15 PM • Keith Williams•75 CommentsPepsi Vs. Hormel Foods: Which The Better Buy Here?HRL, PEP• Tue, Jul. 18, 5:15 PM • Peter F. Way, CFA•9 CommentsTesla In China: A Mega OpportunityTSLA• Tue, Jul. 18, 3:59 PM • Galileo Russell•109 CommentsTesla's Technological ChallengeTSLA• Tue, Jul. 18, 3:09 PM • David Pinsen•119 CommentsHarley-Davidson Is Getting HammeredHOG• Tue, Jul. 18, 3:04 PM • Quad 7 Capital•8 CommentsThe Tesla Freight Network: A $10 Billion OpportunityTSLA• Tue, Jul. 18, 12:44 PM • Trent Eady•236 CommentsTesla Competition: Volkswagen EditionTSLA, VLKAF, VLKAY• Tue, Jul. 18, 12:18 PM • ValueAnalyst•165 CommentsThis Is The Shakeup Procter & Gamble NeedsPG• Tue, Jul. 18, 12:00 PM • Josh Arnold•7 CommentsNational Beverage Corp. Update: Increasing Fair Value EstimateFIZZ• Tue, Jul. 18, 11:57 AM • Detroit Bear•12 CommentsPhilip Morris On A Downhill SlopePM• Tue, Jul. 18, 10:45 AM • ValueAnalyst•68 CommentsOne Of The Best Plays In Today's Stock MarketHAS• Tue, Jul. 18, 10:01 AM • David Trainer•10 CommentsWhy Burberry Deserves A Spot In A Dividend Growth PortfolioBURBY• Tue, Jul. 18, 9:00 AM • The Investment Doctor123456...434Next Page





Earnings Call Transcripts | Seeking AlphaSign in / Join NowGO» 








Earnings Transcripts


  Sectors 


All
Most Popular

Basic Materials
Conglomerates
Consumer Goods
Financial
Healthcare
Industrial Goods
Services
Technology
Utilities










Metso Corporation's (MXTOF) CEO Matti Kähkönen on Q2 2017 Results - Earnings Call Transcript


MXTOF•
      Sat, Jul. 22, 12:08 AM

        •
SA Transcripts




Ingenico Group's (INGIF) CEO Philippe Lazare on Acquisition of Bambora & Q2 2017 Trading Update (Transcript)


INGIF•
      Fri, Jul. 21, 10:17 PM

        •
SA Transcripts




Danske Bank's (DNSKF) CEO Thomas Borgen on Q2 2017 Results - Earnings Call Transcript


DNSKF•
      Fri, Jul. 21,  7:45 PM

        •
SA Transcripts




Cinedigm (CIDM) Cinedigm Bison Agreement Conference (Transcript)


CIDM•
      Fri, Jul. 21,  7:33 PM

        •
SA Transcripts




Western Alliance Bancorporation's (WAL) CEO Robert Sarver on Q2 2017 Results - Earnings Call Transcript


WAL•
      Fri, Jul. 21,  7:16 PM

        •
SA Transcripts




Mobile Mini's (MINI) CEO Erik Olsson on Q2 2017 Results - Earnings Call Transcript


MINI•
      Fri, Jul. 21,  6:55 PM

        •
SA Transcripts




Givaudan's (GVDNY) CEO Gilles Andrier on Q2 2017 Results - Earnings Call Transcript


GVDNY•
      Fri, Jul. 21,  6:50 PM

        •
SA Transcripts




MB Financial's (MBFI) CEO Mitchell Feiger on Q2 2017 Results - Earnings Call Transcript


MBFI•
      Fri, Jul. 21,  6:35 PM

        •
SA Transcripts




Cementos Pacasmayo's (CPAC) CEO Humberto Nadal on Q2 2017 Results - Earnings Call Transcript


CPAC•
      Fri, Jul. 21,  6:35 PM

        •
SA Transcripts




Sensient Technologies' (SXT) CEO Paul Manning on Q2 2017 Results - Earnings Call Transcript


SXT•
      Fri, Jul. 21,  6:12 PM

        •
SA Transcripts




Moody's (MCO) CEO Raymond McDaniel on Q2 2017 Results - Earnings Call Transcript


MCO•
      Fri, Jul. 21,  6:09 PM

        •
SA Transcripts




Regions Financial's (RF) CEO Grayson Hall on Q2 2017 Results - Earnings Call Transcript


RF•
      Fri, Jul. 21,  5:53 PM

        •
SA Transcripts




Accell Group (ACGPF) Q2 2017 Results - Earnings Call Transcript


ACGPF•
      Fri, Jul. 21,  5:52 PM

        •
SA Transcripts




Del Frisco's Restaurant Group's (DFRG) CEO Norman Abdallah on Q2 2017 Results - Earnings Call Transcript


DFRG•
      Fri, Jul. 21,  5:45 PM

        •
SA Transcripts




Volaris Aviation's (VLRS) CEO Enrique Beltranena on Q2 2017 Results - Earnings Call Transcript


VLRS•
      Fri, Jul. 21,  4:53 PM

        •
SA Transcripts




Colgate-Palmolive's (CL) CEO Ian Cook on Q2 2017 Results - Earnings Call Transcript


CL•
      Fri, Jul. 21,  4:51 PM

        •
SA Transcripts
•1 Comment 



McClatchy's (MNI) CEO Craig Forman on Q2 2017 Results - Earnings Call Transcript


MNI•
      Fri, Jul. 21,  4:42 PM

        •
SA Transcripts




Badger Meter's (BMI) CEO Rich Meeusen on Q2 2017 Results - Earnings Call Transcript


BMI•
      Fri, Jul. 21,  4:30 PM

        •
SA Transcripts




OFG Bancorp's (OFG) CEO Jose Rafael Fernandez on Q2 2017 Results - Earnings Call Transcript


OFG•
      Fri, Jul. 21,  4:26 PM

        •
SA Transcripts




General Electric's (GE) CEO Jeff Immelt on Q2 2017 Results - Earnings Call Transcript


GE•
      Fri, Jul. 21,  4:24 PM

        •
SA Transcripts
•15 Comments 



Husky's (HUSKF) CEO Rob Peabody on Q2 2017 Results - Earnings Call Transcript


HUSKF•
      Fri, Jul. 21,  4:21 PM

        •
SA Transcripts




Glacier Bancorp's (GBCI) CEO Randall Chesler on Q2 2017 Results - Earnings Call Transcript


GBCI•
      Fri, Jul. 21,  4:17 PM

        •
SA Transcripts




Honeywell International's (HON) CEO Darius Adamczyk on Q2 2017 Results - Earnings Call Transcript


HON•
      Fri, Jul. 21,  4:15 PM

        •
SA Transcripts
•1 Comment 



CoBiz Financial's (COBZ) CEO Steve Bangert on Q2 2017 Results - Earnings Call Transcript


COBZ•
      Fri, Jul. 21,  3:51 PM

        •
SA Transcripts




Ameris Bancorp's (ABCB) CEO Edwin Hortman on Q2 2017 Results - Earnings Call Transcript


ABCB•
      Fri, Jul. 21,  3:46 PM

        •
SA Transcripts




Banco Latinoamericano De Comercio Exterior's (BLX) CEO Rubens Amaral On Q2 2017 Results - Earnings Call Transcript


BLX•
      Fri, Jul. 21,  3:44 PM

        •
SA Transcripts




Citizens Financial Group's (CFG) CEO Bruce Van Saun on Q2 2017 Results - Earnings Call Transcript


CFG•
      Fri, Jul. 21,  3:31 PM

        •
SA Transcripts




Kansas City Southern's (KSU) CEO Patrick Ottensmeyer on Q2 2017 Results - Earnings Call Transcript


KSU•
      Fri, Jul. 21,  3:05 PM

        •
SA Transcripts




Huntington Bancshares' (HBAN) CEO Steve Steinour on Q2 2017 Results - Earnings Call Transcript


HBAN•
      Fri, Jul. 21,  2:57 PM

        •
SA Transcripts
•1 Comment 



Equity Bancshares' (EQBK) CEO Brad Elliott on Q2 2017 Results - Earnings Call Transcript


EQBK•
      Fri, Jul. 21,  2:56 PM

        •
SA Transcripts





123456...4430Next Page





Search Transcripts






You can use: AND,NOT, OR,* *(exact phrase)













 









	
		
		
		Form  4          Fossil Group, Inc.        For: Mar 02  Filed by: SECOR DENNIS R
	
	









		Research: Stocks: News Story
	












Skip to Main Content.
Site navigation
Fidelity.com Home


Customer Service
Open An Account
Refer A Friend
Log In

Customer Service
Open An Account
Refer A Friend
Log Out
 


Search Fidelity.com




 

 



Accounts & Trade



PortfolioLog In Required


Account PositionsLog In Required


TradeLog In Required


Active Trader ProLog In Required


TransferLog In Required


Cash ManagementLog In Required


BillPayLog In Required


Full ViewLog In Required


ProfileLog In Required


Account FeaturesLog In Required


StatementsLog In Required

Tax Information

Retirement DistributionsLog In Required



OFFER See our featured trading offer. Learn more.



Planning & Advice


What We Offer
Financial Basics
Building Savings
Managing & Growing Wealth
Retirement
Life Events



News & Research


News
Watch ListLog In Required
Quotes
AlertsLog In Required
Mutual Funds
Stocks
Fixed Income, Bonds & CDs
ETFs
Options
Markets & Sectors
IPOs
Annuities
Learning Center
Notebook
Notebook



Investment Products


Mutual Funds
Retirement & IRAs
Trading
Stocks
Fixed Income, Bonds & CDs
ETFs
Options
Sector Investing
Cash Management & Credit Cards
Managed Accounts
Fidelity Go
529 College Savings
Annuities
Life Insurance & Long Term Care



Why Fidelity


The Fidelity Advantage
Planning & Advice
Trading
Straightforward Pricing
Insights & Tools
Security & Protection


 


Customer Service
Open An Account
Refer A Friend
Log In

Customer Service
Open An Account
Refer A Friend
Log Out
 












			Content and data provided by various third parties and Fidelity − Terms of Use




Research >
Stocks >


				
					
					
						News & Events
					
				
				 >
			












Stock Details

Enter Company or Symbol. Press down arrow for suggestions, or Escape to return to entry field.







View this information for the company or symbol

Snapshot
Detailed Quote
Adv Chart & Technical..
News & Events
Compare
Analyst Opinions
Research Reports
Key Statistics
Earnings
Dividends
Ownership & Insiders
Financial Statements
SEC Filings



View this information for the company or symbol

Snapshot
Detailed Quote
Advanced Chart
News
Analyst Reports



Find Symbol. Opens in new window.







Snapshot
Detailed Quote
Advanced Chart & Technical Analysis 
News & Events
Compare
Analyst Opinions
Research Reports
Key Statistics
Earnings
Dividends
Ownership & Insiders
Financial Statements
SEC Filings





RELATED RESOURCES

Stock Research Overview
Stock Screeners
Markets & Sectors
Fidelity Learning Center 




















Print Format


Change Text Size:


Default text sizeA


Larger text sizeA


Largest text sizeA









Form  4          Fossil Group, Inc.        For: Mar 02  Filed by: SECOR DENNIS R
BY 10K Wizard— 9:34 AM ET 03/06/2017


http://archive.fast-edgar.com/20170306/APZZ822CSC22P2Q2222C2WZ29EW9Z2273G92

Filed on: March 6, 2017





More FOSL News



Fossil Group, Inc. Reports Fourth Quarter and Fiscal Year 2016 Results

						GlobeNewswire -
						




4:01 PM ET 02/14/2017


					



Fossil Group, Inc. to Hold Fourth Quarter Fiscal 2016 Earnings Conference Call and Webcast on Tuesday, February 14, 2017 at 4:30PM ET

						GlobeNewswire -
						




7:00 AM ET 02/06/2017


					













 Copyright
1998–2017 FMR LLC. 
All rights reserved. 

Terms of Use|
Privacy|
Security|
Site Map 
















































	
		
		
		Stock Market Research: Top Stocks, Quotes & News - Fidelity Investments
	
	





















Skip to Main Content.
Site navigation
Fidelity.com Home


Customer Service
Open An Account
Refer A Friend
Log In

Customer Service
Open An Account
Refer A Friend
Log Out
 


Search Fidelity.com




 

 



Accounts & Trade



PortfolioLog In Required


Account PositionsLog In Required


TradeLog In Required


Active Trader ProLog In Required


TransferLog In Required


Cash ManagementLog In Required


BillPayLog In Required


Full ViewLog In Required


ProfileLog In Required


Account FeaturesLog In Required


StatementsLog In Required

Tax Information

Retirement DistributionsLog In Required



OFFER See our featured trading offer. Learn more.



Planning & Advice


What We Offer
Financial Basics
Building Savings
Managing & Growing Wealth
Retirement
Life Events



News & Research


News
Watch ListLog In Required
Quotes
AlertsLog In Required
Mutual Funds
Stocks
Fixed Income, Bonds & CDs
ETFs
Options
Markets & Sectors
IPOs
Annuities
Learning Center
Notebook
Notebook



Investment Products


Mutual Funds
Retirement & IRAs
Trading
Stocks
Fixed Income, Bonds & CDs
ETFs
Options
Sector Investing
Cash Management & Credit Cards
Managed Accounts
Fidelity Go
529 College Savings
Annuities
Life Insurance & Long Term Care



Why Fidelity


The Fidelity Advantage
Planning & Advice
Trading
Straightforward Pricing
Insights & Tools
Security & Protection


 


Customer Service
Open An Account
Refer A Friend
Log In

Customer Service
Open An Account
Refer A Friend
Log Out
 












			Content and data provided by various third parties and Fidelity − Terms of Use




Research >
Stocks >













Stock Details


Enter Company or Symbol. Press down arrow for suggestions, or Escape to return to entry field.







View this information for the company or symbol

Snapshot
Detailed Quote
Adv Chart & Technical..
News & Events
Compare
Analyst Opinions
Research Reports
Key Statistics
Earnings
Dividends
Ownership & Insiders
Financial Statements
SEC Filings



View this information for the company or symbol

Snapshot
Detailed Quote
Advanced Chart
News
Analyst Reports



Find Symbol. Opens in new window.






Stock Research & Ideas



You are here: Stock Research Center


		
		
		
		My Research 

Screen & Filter

Stock Screeners
Preset Expert Strategies

News & Insights

Events Calendar
Upgrades / Downgrades

Explore Firm Research

Research Firms
Research Firm Scorecards
Reports Search





RELATED RESOURCES

Fidelity Learning Center 
U.S. Markets
Global Markets
Sectors & Industries
















Stock Research Center

 Not a Fidelity Customer?
    No problem! Try our research for FREE without opening an account.




 














Trending Stocks



Market Movers
Top Rated by Sector
Orders by Fidelity Customers






Filters:


Refresh
Equity Summary Score


Provided by Starmine












Investing Insights



Technical Events
PROVIDED BY Recognia AS OF 07/22/2017
Methodology
RECOGNIA METHODOLOGY
Bullish and Bearish Events of the Day provide long/short trading ideas by identifying U.S. stocks that have recently formed a bullish or bearish classic chart pattern. Patterns must have taken at least 35 days to form, which draws out the more significant patterns for intermediate or long-term trend direction. The list is then filtered to include stocks with a minimum $3.00 for bullish and $5.00 for bearish close price; and, a minimum 50,000 trading volume. Most recent patterns are listed first. Patterns on the same date are sorted using Recognia's proprietary quantitative algorithm to draw strong companies to the top, and if further sorting is required (for stocks with the same quantitative analysis result) it is done by trading volume to draw highest volume stocks to the top.





BOFI
Log in for Events


HAFC


AN


EARN


EPAM








SN
Log in for Events


CHKP


LHO


FIT


GTS




Find out how to use fundamental analysis and technical analysis when evaluating stocks, with the help of the Fidelity Learning Center.






My Research – 
Organize and track your favorite securities.


				
				
				
				Get started 





Today's Events
AS OF 3:41 PM ET 07/22/2017







Earnings (0)
Dividends (0)
Splits (11)


Upgrades (0)
Downgrades (0)
Economic (0)










Upcoming Webinar Events
Visit the Learning Center Events page for a full list of upcoming webinars.
	














The Equity Summary Score is provided for informational purposes only, does not constitute advice or guidance, and is not an endorsement or recommendation for any particular security or trading strategy. The Equity Summary Score is provided by Thomson Reuters StarMine, an independent company not affiliated with Fidelity Investments.*GICS® (Global Industry Classification Standards) is an industry classification system developed by Standard & Poor's in collaboration with Morgan Stanley Capital International (MSCI). S&P uses GICS to determine the market segment to which a company is assigned.News, commentary (including "Related Symbols") and events are from third-party sources unaffiliated with Fidelity. Fidelity does not endorse or adopt their content. Fidelity makes no guarantees that information supplied is accurate, complete, or timely, and does not provide any warranties regarding results obtained from their use.Stock markets, especially foreign markets, are volatile and can decline significantly in response to adverse issuer, political, regulatory, market, or economic developments. Sector funds can be more volatile because of their narrow concentration in a specific industry.System availability and response times may be subject to market conditions.The Fidelity Screeners are research tools provided to help self-directed investors evaluate securities. The criteria and inputs entered are at the sole discretion of the user, and all screens or strategies with preselected criteria are solely for the convenience of the user. Information supplied or obtained from the Screeners is for informational purposes only and should not be considered investment advice or guidance, an offer of or a solicitation of an offer to buy or sell securities, or a recommendation or endorsement by Fidelity of any security or investment strategy. Fidelity does not endorse or adopt any particular investment strategy or approach to screening or evaluating stocks, preferred securities, exchange traded products or closed end funds. Fidelity makes no guarantees that information supplied is accurate, complete, or timely, and does not provide any warranties regarding results obtained from their use. Determine which securities are right for you based on your investment objectives, risk tolerance, financial situation and other individual factors and re-evaluate them on a periodic basis.














 Copyright
1998–2017 FMR LLC. 
All rights reserved. 

Terms of Use|
Privacy|
Security|
Site Map 





















































	
		
		
		FOSL Stock News - Fidelity
	
	




















Skip to Main Content.
Site navigation
Fidelity.com Home


Customer Service
Open An Account
Refer A Friend
Log In

Customer Service
Open An Account
Refer A Friend
Log Out
 


Search Fidelity.com




 

 



Accounts & Trade



PortfolioLog In Required


Account PositionsLog In Required


TradeLog In Required


Active Trader ProLog In Required


TransferLog In Required


Cash ManagementLog In Required


BillPayLog In Required


Full ViewLog In Required


ProfileLog In Required


Account FeaturesLog In Required


StatementsLog In Required

Tax Information

Retirement DistributionsLog In Required



OFFER See our featured trading offer. Learn more.



Planning & Advice


What We Offer
Financial Basics
Building Savings
Managing & Growing Wealth
Retirement
Life Events



News & Research


News
Watch ListLog In Required
Quotes
AlertsLog In Required
Mutual Funds
Stocks
Fixed Income, Bonds & CDs
ETFs
Options
Markets & Sectors
IPOs
Annuities
Learning Center
Notebook
Notebook



Investment Products


Mutual Funds
Retirement & IRAs
Trading
Stocks
Fixed Income, Bonds & CDs
ETFs
Options
Sector Investing
Cash Management & Credit Cards
Managed Accounts
Fidelity Go
529 College Savings
Annuities
Life Insurance & Long Term Care



Why Fidelity


The Fidelity Advantage
Planning & Advice
Trading
Straightforward Pricing
Insights & Tools
Security & Protection


 


Customer Service
Open An Account
Refer A Friend
Log In

Customer Service
Open An Account
Refer A Friend
Log Out
 













			Content and data provided by various third parties and Fidelity − Terms of Use




Research >
Stocks >












Stock Details

Enter Company or Symbol. Press down arrow for suggestions, or Escape to return to entry field.







View this information for the company or symbol

Snapshot
Detailed Quote
Adv Chart & Technical..
News & Events
Compare
Analyst Opinions
Research Reports
Key Statistics
Earnings
Dividends
Ownership & Insiders
Financial Statements
SEC Filings



View this information for the company or symbol

Snapshot
Detailed Quote
Advanced Chart
News
Analyst Reports



Find Symbol. Opens in new window.







Snapshot
Detailed Quote
Advanced Chart & Technical Analysis 
News & Events
Compare
Analyst Opinions
Research Reports
Key Statistics
Earnings
Dividends
Ownership & Insiders
Financial Statements
SEC Filings





RELATED RESOURCES

Stock Research Overview
Stock Screeners
Markets & Sectors
Fidelity Learning Center 

















Print
|
Help/Glossary




Help/Glossary








News & Events:FOSL

FOSSIL GROUP INC

10.74 -0.13 (-1.20 %)as of 4:00:00pm ET 07/21/2017



			
				Quotes delayed at least 15 min.
				
				
					
					
					
					
					Log in for real time quote.





Add to Watch List
Set Alert
Hypothetical Trade
Option Chain


Price History 

Download to CSV file
Download to Excel file


















Log in for more news

Expand all| Collapse all



















                                                    Stock Performance Review on Textile Industry -- Crocs, Fossil, Iconix Brand, and Steven Madden
                                                


                                                    PR Newswire – 
                                                    7:10 AM ET 07/17/2017
                                                


NEW YORK, July 17, 2017 If you want a Stock Review on CROX, FOSL, ICON or SHOO then come over to http://dailystocktracker.com/register/ and sign up for your free customized report today. http://dailystocktracker.com/register/ Crocs . Niwot, Colorado headquartered Crocs Inc.'s (CROX) shares finished Friday's session at $7.51, slightly lower by 0.40%. A total volume of 519,603 shares was traded at the e...

















                                                    Textile Stock Performance Review -- Crocs, Fossil, Iconix Brand, and Steven Madden
                                                


                                                    PR Newswire – 
                                                    6:35 AM ET 06/16/2017
                                                


NEW YORK, June 16, 2017 Companies in the Textile - Apparel Footwear and Accessories space design, manufacture, and retail fashion products related to footwear, along with other equipment and accessories. http://dailystocktracker.com/register/ Crocs . Niwot, Colorado headquartered Crocs Inc.'s (CROX) stock finished Thursday's session 0.27% lower at $7.41 with a total trading volume of 730,920 shares. h...













						                            
			                                Fossil stock price target cut to $8 from $12 at Wells Fargo
			                            


			                                MarketWatch – 
			                                7:37 AM ET 06/15/2017
			                            
















                                                    Fossil shares plummet after sales of wearables fail to offset declines elsewhere
                                                


                                                    MarketWatch – 
                                                    8:00 AM ET 05/11/2017
                                                


Shares are down nearly 23% in Wednesday trading. Fossil Group Inc. (FOSL) shares plunged 23% in Wednesday trading, the lowest level since March 2009, after it reported sales declines, particularly in its leathers business, that growth in wearables failed to offset. First-quarter sales totaled $581.8 million, down from $659.8 million year-over-year and below the $591.0 million FactSet consensus.

















                                                    Stock winners and losers -- Nvidia rockets and Yelp tumbles
                                                


                                                    MarketWatch – 
                                                    11:34 AM ET 05/10/2017
                                                


Earnings season is creating volatility in the U.S. equity market. Earnings season brings out volatility in stock prices, which can be lucrative if you're targeting the right companies. Shares of Yelp Inc. (YELP) were down 19% on Wednesday, after it lowered its sales outlook because of an outflow of local advertising customers.

















                                                    Nasdaq opens flat; Dow, S&P 500 slide
                                                


                                                    MarketWatch – 
                                                    9:48 AM ET 05/10/2017
                                                


The Nasdaq Composite Index opened flat Wednesday, even as the other two main benchmarks saw modest declines, following President Donald Trump's abrupt firing late Tuesday of FBI Director James Comey. The S&P 500 index slid 2 points, or 0.1%, to 2,394, while the Dow Jones Industrial Average shed 54 points, or 0.1%, to 20,926. The Nasdaq was off 2 points points, or less than 0.1%, at 6,118. Trump fired Comey late Tuesday on the advice of Attorney General Jeff Sessions and Sessions' deputy,...













						                            
			                                Fossil stock price target cut to $13 from $15 at Instinet
			                            


			                                MarketWatch – 
			                                9:19 AM ET 05/10/2017
			                            












						                            
			                                Fossil's stock on track to open at an 8-year low
			                            


			                                MarketWatch – 
			                                9:11 AM ET 05/10/2017
			                            












						                            
			                                Fossil's stock tumbles 20% premarket after Q1 results late Tuesday
			                            


			                                MarketWatch – 
			                                9:10 AM ET 05/10/2017
			                            
















                                                    Fossil Group shares plummet after results, outlook miss Street view
                                                


                                                    MarketWatch – 
                                                    5:22 PM ET 05/09/2017
                                                


Fossil Group Inc. (FOSL) shares tanked in the extended session Tuesday after the fashion-accessories maker's quarterly results and outlook fell well short of Wall Street expectations. Fossil shares plummeted 17% to $14.99 after hours. The company reported an adjusted loss of $1 a share on revenue of $581.8 million.

















                                                    BRIEF-Fossil Group reports Q1 sales $582 million
                                                


                                                    Reuters – 
                                                    5:18 PM ET 05/09/2017
                                                


Fossil Group Inc (FOSL). * Fossil Group, Inc. (FOSL) reports first quarter fiscal year 2017 results. * Q1 loss per share $1.00. * Sees FY 2017 sales down 1.5 to 6 percent. * Q1 sales $582 million versus I/B/E/S view $590.5 million.

















                                                    Fossil Group, Inc.  Reports First Quarter Fiscal Year 2017 Results
                                                


                                                    GlobeNewswire – 
                                                    4:01 PM ET 05/09/2017
                                                


First Quarter Net Sales of $582 Million; Diluted EPS of $, Including a Restructuring Charge of $0.35 per Diluted Share   Provides Second Quarter and Updates Annual Fiscal 2017 GAAP Guidance  RICHARDSON, Texas, May 09, 2017 -- Fossil Group, Inc. (FOSL) today reported its financial results for the fiscal quarter ended April 1, 2017.

















                                                    Fossil Group, Inc. to Hold First Quarter Fiscal 2017 Earnings Conference Call and Webcast on Tuesday, May 9, 2017 at 4:30PM ET
                                                


                                                    GlobeNewswire – 
                                                    7:00 AM ET 05/02/2017
                                                


Fossil Group, Inc. (FOSL) announced today that its earnings for the fiscal first quarter ended April 1, 2017 will be released following the market close on Tuesday, May 9, 2017. In conjunction with the release, the Company will host a real-time webcast of the Companys first quarter 2017 earnings conference call on the same day, Tuesday, May 9, 2017 at 4:30 p.m. ET.

















                                                    Fossil Group, Inc. Reports Fourth Quarter and Fiscal Year 2016 Results
                                                


                                                    GlobeNewswire – 
                                                    4:01 PM ET 02/14/2017
                                                


Fourth Quarter Net Sales of $959 Million; Diluted EPS of $1.03 Fiscal Year 2016 Net Sales of $3.0 Billion; Diluted EPS of $1.63 Provides First Quarter and Annual 2017 GAAP and Adjusted Guidance RICHARDSON, Texas, Feb. 14, 2017 -- Fossil Group, Inc. today reported its financial results for the fourth quarter and fiscal year ended December 31, 2016.

















                                                    Fossil Group, Inc. to Hold Fourth Quarter Fiscal 2016 Earnings Conference Call and Webcast on Tuesday, February 14, 2017 at 4:30PM ET
                                                


                                                    GlobeNewswire – 
                                                    7:00 AM ET 02/06/2017
                                                


Fossil Group, Inc. (FOSL) announced today that its earnings for the fiscal fourth quarter ended December 31, 2016 will be released following the market close on Tuesday, February 14, 2017. In conjunction with the release, the Company will host a real-time webcast of the Companys fourth quarter 2016 earnings conference call on the same day, Tuesday, February 14, 2017 at 4:30 p.m. ET.












Page: 


Page 1





Today's and Upcoming Events




Aug
8


FOSL to announce Q2 earnings After Market (Unconfirmed)









Past Events (last 90 days)




May
24


Shareholders Meeting






Data provided by Wall Street Horizon, Inc. © 2017

Technical Events

Classic Patterns (past 90 days)
PROVIDED BY RECOGNIA, INC.

Log in for trading events

View All Technical Analysis in Advanced Chart 



Technical Analysis
PROVIDED BY TRADING CENTRAL

Log in for trading events












As with all your investments through Fidelity, you must make your own determination whether an investment is appropriate for you.  Fidelity is not recommending or endorsing this security by making it available to customers.  You should conduct research and perform a thorough investigation as to the characteristics of any securities you intend to purchase.  Before investing, you should read the prospectus, offering circular, indenture, or similar document carefully for a full description of the product, including its features and risks, to determine whether it is an appropriate investment for your investment objectives, risk tolerance, financial situation and other individual factors, and be sure to re-evaluate those factors on a periodic basis.Performance data shown represents past performance, which is no guarantee of future results. Current performance may be higher or lower than the performance data quoted.  Yield and return will vary, therefore, you may have a gain or loss when you sell your shares.Stock markets are volatile and can decline significantly in response to adverse issuer, political, regulatory, market, or economic developments.  Growth stocks can be more volatile than other types of stocks.  Value stocks can continue to be undervalued by the market for long periods of time.  Foreign securities are subject to interest-rate, currency-exchange-rate, economic, and political risks, all of which are magnified in emerging markets.  Illiquidity is an inherent risk associated with investing in real estate and REITs.  There is no guarantee the issuer of a REIT will maintain the secondary market for its shares and redemptions may be at a price which is more or less than the original price paid.  Closed-end funds can trade at a discount to their NAV.  Shareholders of Master Limited Partnerships may be treated as partners for tax purposes.  Partnerships issue a Schedule K-1 (Form 1065) rather than a Form 1099 form for tax purposes. It lists the partner's share of income, deductions, credits, etc.  Speak with your tax advisor to determine how this may affect you.  A royalty trust is a type of corporation, mostly in the United States or Canada, usually involved in oil and gas production or mining.  Royalty trusts may have special tax treatment, so you should consult a tax advisor on the potential tax consequences of investing in them.News, commentary and events are from third-party sources unaffiliated with Fidelity. Fidelity does not endorse or adopt their content.  Fidelity makes no guarantees that information supplied is accurate, complete, or timely, and does not provide any warranties regarding results obtained from their use.Any data, charts and other information provided on this page are intended for research purposes to help self-directed investors evaluate many types of securities including, but not limited to common stocks, American Depository Receipts, Master Limited Partnerships, real estate investment trusts. traditional preferred stock, trust preferred securities, third-party trust certificates, convertible securities, mandatory convertible securities and other exchange-traded equity and/or debt securities.  Criteria and inputs entered, including the choice to make security comparisons, are at the sole discretion of the user and are solely for the convenience of the user.  Analyst opinions, ratings and reports are provided by third-parties unaffiliated with Fidelity.  All information supplied or obtained from this page is for informational purposes only and should not be considered investment advice or guidance, an offer of or a solicitation of an offer to buy or sell a security, or a recommendation or endorsement by Fidelity of any security or investment strategy.  Fidelity does not endorse or adopt any particular investment strategy, any analyst opinion/rating/report or any approach to evaluating individual securities. Fidelity makes no guarantees that information supplied is accurate, complete, or timely, and does not provide any warranties regarding results obtained from its use.462499.6.0








 Copyright
1998–2017 FMR LLC. 
All rights reserved. 

Terms of Use|
Privacy|
Security|
Site Map 








































See the Latest Features





PersonalizedGet relevant information about your holdings right when you need it.See Your Performance Click the portfolio icon to get information about stocks you own without leaving the research page.Faster Access to Positions A shortcut to view the full list of positions in your portfolio? Yes, please! Use the ticker search box.Add Your Own Notes Use Notebook to save your investment ideas in one convenient, private, and secure place.





Convenient For YouResearch that's clear, accessible, and all in one place makes for a better experience.One-Stop Shop See everything you need to make investment decisions right in the dashboard.Access Anywhere No matter where you are, use the Stock Research experience across multiple devices.New Ideas, On the Ready Find new ideas using quick links to the Stock Screener.





New Ways to ResearchDiscover new tools to add or diversify your existing research strategy.StockTwits Read live tweets from the financial and investing community about the stock you're interested in.Fundamental Analysis Save time on research by getting an overall assessment of a company's valuation, quality, growth stability, and financial health.Recognia Technical Analysis Perfect for the technical trader—this indicator captures a stock's technical events and converts them into short, medium, and long-term sentiment.Top Competitors See how a stock measures up by instantly comparing it to the industry average and its top four competitors.Social Sentiment Get a sense of people's overall feelings towards a company in social media with this summary tool.Earnings Data Monitor earnings expectations over the past three quarters and model a stock's price based on its P/E.








Dennis R. Secor , Fossil Group, Inc. - Leadership Profiles































Products


Resources


About 


Client Support


Order








Dennis R. Secor  Leadership® Profile
Executive Vice President, Chief Financial Officer and TreasurerFossil Group, Inc.
Telephone, Email, and Fax available

Total Positions available: 1

Career History includes:
Senior Vice President and Chief Financial Officer,  GUESS?, Inc.,  ,  
(1 additional careers available)


 Purchase This Profile
Request Free Trial


Dennis R. Secor 's profile is included with a subscription to any of these Leadership® Online products:
Leadership® Companies Premium Leadership Networks® The Leadership Library®


About Leadership Directories

Leadership Directories [LDI] researches and offers in-depth profiles of more than 750,000 decision-makers at 150,000 leading organizations across the U.S. public and private sectors – available online; in print; on demand; or as lists, datafeeds, or custom solutions.Our high-quality data is updated daily with 4,000+ changes verified by NYC- and DC-based staff.


 




                Toll free: 1-800-627-0311

                1407 Broadway, Suite 318, New York, NY 10018
Tel: (212) 627-4140     Fax: (212) 645-0931
            

                1667 K Street, NW, Suite 801, Washington, DC 20006
Tel: (202) 347-7757       Fax:
                (202) 628-3430
            




Terms of use

|

Privacy Policy

|

FAQ

|

Contact us


 ©  Leadership Directories, Inc.
            





   Dennis Secor | Fossil Inc | ZoomInfo.com


Microsoft personalized ad preferences




 













To opt out of personalized ads in this browser, your browser history must allow first-party and third-party cookies and you must have your browsing experience set to NOT delete browsing history on exit. Instructions for enabling cookies and configuring your browsing history may be available in your browsers settings, privacy, or help documentation.

















Sign in
















  Hold on… We’re sorry but this didn’t work.                  You can’t turn off personalized ads right now because your browser is currently blocking third-party cookies. We can help you fix this issue.                Let’s get started:  Depending on what browser you use, open Options or Settings.                  Make sure that third-party cookies are not blocked anymore. To find out how, search your browser’s Help.                                 Revisit http://choice.microsoft.com/opt-out, and then on the “Personalized ads in this browser” tile, click Off.                 ext74081 




  About Our Ads To create a more customized online experience, some of the ads you may receive on Microsoft websites and apps are tailored to your previous activities, searches and site visits. You're in control and here's where you can make the advertising choice that's right for you. ext74075 




  Where Can I Learn More about Advertising on Microsoft Websites and Apps? Microsoft partners with Oath, AppNexus and other third party service providers to help present customized content and display advertisements on MSN, Outlook.com and other websites and apps. Microsoft also delivers search ads to Bing and our search syndication partners. Learn more about Microsoft’s privacy practices here. You can learn more about interest-based ads from Oath and AppNexus in their privacy statements: Oath and AppNexus. What Choices Do I Have About Interest-Based Advertising? On this page, you can opt out of receiving interest based advertising from Microsoft. You can also opt out of receiving interest-based advertising from all self-regulatory members, including Microsoft, Oath, AppNexus and other third party ad networks, at the following sites:  In the US: Digital Advertising Alliance (DAA) In Europe: European Interactive Digital Advertising Alliance (EDAA) In Canada: Ad Choices: Digital Advertising Alliance of Canada (DAAC)  You can control interest-based advertising in Windows apps by turning off the advertising ID in Windows Settings.  More choices  Do you want personalized ads from other companies?  Questions? If you have a privacy question or a question for the Chief Privacy Officer of Microsoft, please contact us by using our web form. We will respond to questions within 30 days. ext74076 




       Personalized ads in this browser     OFF    Opt-out is currently unavailable, please try again later.  Control the "personalized ads" setting for this web browser.  Learn more           If you want Microsoft to show ads that might be relevant to you, click On. To show “generic” ads, click Off.          ext74078 




       Personalized ads wherever I use my Microsoft account     OFF   Sign in to change...    Opt-out is currently unavailable, please try again later.  Control the "personalized ads" setting that applies when you are signed in on any computer or device with your Microsoft account, including Windows, Windows phone, Xbox and other devices.  Learn more                    If you want Microsoft to show ads that might be relevant to you, click On. To show “generic” ads, click Off.         If you choose “generic” ads and use a browser, your choice applies to everyone when using that browser as long as you do not clear your cookies.          ext74079 




       Personalized ads in Windows         In your Windows Settings, you can turn off personalized ads that appear in apps on this device. You’ll still see ads, but they won’t be personalized anymore.     If you have Windows 8.1:            Access the charms by touching or moving your pointer to the right edge of the screen.                 Click or tap Settings, and then click or tap Change PC Settings.                 Click or tap Privacy, and then turn off Let apps use my advertising ID for experiences across apps.          If you have Windows 10:            Click or tap the Start button.                 Click or tap Settings.                 Click or tap Privacy, and then turn off Let apps use my advertising ID for experiences across apps.          If you have a Windows mobile device:            Go to Settings.                 Tap on Privacy.                 Tap on Advertising ID, and then turn off Let apps use my advertising ID for experiences across apps.                If you want to turn off personalized ads from Microsoft wherever you use your Microsoft account including apps on Windows, Windows Phone, Xbox and other devices, you can do so by selecting the Microsoft account option above.    ext74080 














Legal
Privacy & Cookies
© 2017 Microsoft






















Loading Your Search Results - PeopleLooker.com























Updating Data On {{nameize fn}}{{#if mi}} {{nameize mi}}{{/if}} {{nameize ln}} {{#validLocation city}}in {{city}}{{#validLocation state}},{{/validLocation}} {{/validLocation}}{{#validLocation state}}{{#unless city}}in {{/unless}}{{uppercase state}}{{/validLocation}}
Important! PeopleLooker uses real public records. The information may be surprising.












Less than 30 seconds remaining


Continue to Results 







Now
We look up all people named {{nameize fn}} {{nameize ln}}.




Next
You pick which one you're looking for.




Then
We search our database for info on them.




Hooray!
You get your report!












Where does {{nameize fn}}{{#if mi}} {{uppercase mi}}{{/if}} {{nameize ln}}
live?
Please help us narrow down your search











All States
Alabama
Alaska
Arizona
Arkansas
California
Colorado
Connecticut
Delaware
District Of Columbia
Florida
Georgia
Hawaii
Idaho
Illinois
Indiana
Iowa
Kansas
Kentucky
Louisiana
Maine
Maryland
Massachusetts
Michigan
Minnesota
Mississippi
Missouri
Montana
Nebraska
Nevada
New Hampshire
New Jersey
New Mexico
New York
North Carolina
North Dakota
Ohio
Oklahoma
Oregon
Pennsylvania
Rhode Island
South Carolina
South Dakota
Tennessee
Texas
Utah
Vermont
Virginia
Washington
West Virginia
Wisconsin
Wyoming





I'm not sure














Please enter a full name
Please help us narrow down your search







First Name:

Please Enter First Name


Last Name:

Please Enter Last Name












































People Searching Made Easy! | PeopleLooker
































Looking to Find Out About Someone?

Find information you may not get on Google.












State
Alabama
Alaska
Arizona
Arkansas
California
Colorado
Connecticut
Delaware
District Of Columbia
Florida
Georgia
Hawaii
Idaho
Illinois
Indiana
Iowa
Kansas
Kentucky
Louisiana
Maine
Maryland
Massachusetts
Michigan
Minnesota
Mississippi
Missouri
Montana
Nebraska
Nevada
New Hampshire
New Jersey
New Mexico
New York
North Carolina
North Dakota
Ohio
Oklahoma
Oregon
Pennsylvania
Rhode Island
South Carolina
South Dakota
Tennessee
Texas
Utah
Vermont
Virginia
Washington
West Virginia
Wisconsin
Wyoming





Search





We respect your privacy.













We've run over


1,000,000


background reports!
Successful background reports!









Access Premium Public Records

Quickly search public records that could otherwise take you weeks or months
to collect. Find friends, relatives, neighbors, or even yourself. Comprehensive
people search reports may contain:




Names
Criminal Records
Date of Birth




Phone Numbers
Addresses
Court Records




Relatives
Email Addresses
Much More!




Names
Criminal Records
Date of Birth
Relatives
Email Addresses




Phone Numbers
Addresses
Court Records
Much More!







The New Way to Find People
More than a regular search engine.

It's the quick and easy way to look people up. Do a deep public record
search to uncover the important information you're looking for. Now you'll
never have to search someone on google again.





































People Searching Made Easy! | PeopleLooker
































Looking to Find Out About Someone?

Find information you may not get on Google.












State
Alabama
Alaska
Arizona
Arkansas
California
Colorado
Connecticut
Delaware
District Of Columbia
Florida
Georgia
Hawaii
Idaho
Illinois
Indiana
Iowa
Kansas
Kentucky
Louisiana
Maine
Maryland
Massachusetts
Michigan
Minnesota
Mississippi
Missouri
Montana
Nebraska
Nevada
New Hampshire
New Jersey
New Mexico
New York
North Carolina
North Dakota
Ohio
Oklahoma
Oregon
Pennsylvania
Rhode Island
South Carolina
South Dakota
Tennessee
Texas
Utah
Vermont
Virginia
Washington
West Virginia
Wisconsin
Wyoming





Search





We respect your privacy.













We've run over


1,000,000


background reports!
Successful background reports!









Access Premium Public Records

Quickly search public records that could otherwise take you weeks or months
to collect. Find friends, relatives, neighbors, or even yourself. Comprehensive
people search reports may contain:




Names
Criminal Records
Date of Birth




Phone Numbers
Addresses
Court Records




Relatives
Email Addresses
Much More!




Names
Criminal Records
Date of Birth
Relatives
Email Addresses




Phone Numbers
Addresses
Court Records
Much More!







The New Way to Find People
More than a regular search engine.

It's the quick and easy way to look people up. Do a deep public record
search to uncover the important information you're looking for. Now you'll
never have to search someone on google again.





































People Searching Made Easy! | PeopleLooker
































Looking to Find Out About Someone?

Find information you may not get on Google.












State
Alabama
Alaska
Arizona
Arkansas
California
Colorado
Connecticut
Delaware
District Of Columbia
Florida
Georgia
Hawaii
Idaho
Illinois
Indiana
Iowa
Kansas
Kentucky
Louisiana
Maine
Maryland
Massachusetts
Michigan
Minnesota
Mississippi
Missouri
Montana
Nebraska
Nevada
New Hampshire
New Jersey
New Mexico
New York
North Carolina
North Dakota
Ohio
Oklahoma
Oregon
Pennsylvania
Rhode Island
South Carolina
South Dakota
Tennessee
Texas
Utah
Vermont
Virginia
Washington
West Virginia
Wisconsin
Wyoming





Search





We respect your privacy.













We've run over


1,000,000


background reports!
Successful background reports!









Access Premium Public Records

Quickly search public records that could otherwise take you weeks or months
to collect. Find friends, relatives, neighbors, or even yourself. Comprehensive
people search reports may contain:




Names
Criminal Records
Date of Birth




Phone Numbers
Addresses
Court Records




Relatives
Email Addresses
Much More!




Names
Criminal Records
Date of Birth
Relatives
Email Addresses




Phone Numbers
Addresses
Court Records
Much More!







The New Way to Find People
More than a regular search engine.

It's the quick and easy way to look people up. Do a deep public record
search to uncover the important information you're looking for. Now you'll
never have to search someone on google again.





































People Searching Made Easy! | PeopleLooker
































Looking to Find Out About Someone?

Find information you may not get on Google.












State
Alabama
Alaska
Arizona
Arkansas
California
Colorado
Connecticut
Delaware
District Of Columbia
Florida
Georgia
Hawaii
Idaho
Illinois
Indiana
Iowa
Kansas
Kentucky
Louisiana
Maine
Maryland
Massachusetts
Michigan
Minnesota
Mississippi
Missouri
Montana
Nebraska
Nevada
New Hampshire
New Jersey
New Mexico
New York
North Carolina
North Dakota
Ohio
Oklahoma
Oregon
Pennsylvania
Rhode Island
South Carolina
South Dakota
Tennessee
Texas
Utah
Vermont
Virginia
Washington
West Virginia
Wisconsin
Wyoming





Search





We respect your privacy.













We've run over


1,000,000


background reports!
Successful background reports!









Access Premium Public Records

Quickly search public records that could otherwise take you weeks or months
to collect. Find friends, relatives, neighbors, or even yourself. Comprehensive
people search reports may contain:




Names
Criminal Records
Date of Birth




Phone Numbers
Addresses
Court Records




Relatives
Email Addresses
Much More!




Names
Criminal Records
Date of Birth
Relatives
Email Addresses




Phone Numbers
Addresses
Court Records
Much More!







The New Way to Find People
More than a regular search engine.

It's the quick and easy way to look people up. Do a deep public record
search to uncover the important information you're looking for. Now you'll
never have to search someone on google again.



























Background Checks and Public Records Search - Truthfinder








 


















Call Toll Free!  (800) 699-8081



Public Records Search
Social Media, Photos, Police Records, Background Checks, Contact Information and Much More!









START HERE - Try searching a friend, relative, celebrity, yourself, or someone else you might know...



First Name:





Last Name:





City:





State:


All States
Alabama
Alaska
Arizona
Arkansas
California
Colorado
Connecticut
District Of Columbia
Delaware
Florida
Georgia
Hawaii
Idaho
Illinois
Indiana
Iowa
Kansas
Kentucky
Louisiana
Maine
Maryland
Massachusetts
Michigan
Minnesota
Mississippi
Missouri
Montana
Nebraska
Nevada
New Hampshire
New Jersey
New Mexico
New York
North Carolina
North Dakota
Ohio
Oklahoma
Oregon
Pennsylvania
Rhode Island
South Carolina
South Dakota
Tennessee
Texas
Utah
Vermont
Virgin Islands
Virginia
Washington
West Virginia
Wisconsin
Wyoming





This is me
Searching for yourself?




Search





  This secure connection is confirmed




We're Very Popular















What Our Happy Users Are Saying




"TruthFinder.com is freakishly accurate… Really scary how much info is out there." -Zac K.


"You found an old friend for me. Thank you." -Nancy V.


"TruthFinder is an excellent site for finding out about someone." -Sherrie F.


"This site is so wonderful. I found my lost godchildren and their mom. Thank you so much." -Lawrence W.


"This is one way to really know a potential date." -Charmaine R.


"Your service is more than perfect. It is a blessing. Thank you for the very hard work that you do." -Richard B.


"Truthfinder is a very accurate updated system. Their information is proper. And can be very helpful too." -Juan M.









Notice
This site contains REAL police records (court records of driving citations, speeding tickets, felonies, misdemeanors, sexual offenses, mugshots, etc.), background reports, photos, court documents, address information, phone numbers, and much more. Please BE CAREFUL when conducting a search and ensure all the information you enter is accurate.
Learning the truth about the history of your family and friends can be shocking, so please be cautious when using this tool.
TruthFinder does not provide consumer reports and is not a consumer reporting agency. We provide a lot of sensitive information that can be used to satisfy your curiosity, protect your family, and find the truth about the people in your life. You may not use our service or the information it provides to make decisions about consumer credit, employers, insurance, tenant screening, or any other purposes that would require FCRA compliance.
I Understand


Help Us Refine Your Results
Select Your Gender



Male



Female

NEXT

Skip






















Background Checks and Public Records Search - Truthfinder








 


















Call Toll Free!  (800) 699-8081



Public Records Search
Social Media, Photos, Police Records, Background Checks, Contact Information and Much More!









START HERE - Try searching a friend, relative, celebrity, yourself, or someone else you might know...



First Name:





Last Name:





City:





State:


All States
Alabama
Alaska
Arizona
Arkansas
California
Colorado
Connecticut
District Of Columbia
Delaware
Florida
Georgia
Hawaii
Idaho
Illinois
Indiana
Iowa
Kansas
Kentucky
Louisiana
Maine
Maryland
Massachusetts
Michigan
Minnesota
Mississippi
Missouri
Montana
Nebraska
Nevada
New Hampshire
New Jersey
New Mexico
New York
North Carolina
North Dakota
Ohio
Oklahoma
Oregon
Pennsylvania
Rhode Island
South Carolina
South Dakota
Tennessee
Texas
Utah
Vermont
Virgin Islands
Virginia
Washington
West Virginia
Wisconsin
Wyoming





This is me
Searching for yourself?




Search





  This secure connection is confirmed




We're Very Popular















What Our Happy Users Are Saying




"TruthFinder.com is freakishly accurate… Really scary how much info is out there." -Zac K.


"You found an old friend for me. Thank you." -Nancy V.


"TruthFinder is an excellent site for finding out about someone." -Sherrie F.


"This site is so wonderful. I found my lost godchildren and their mom. Thank you so much." -Lawrence W.


"This is one way to really know a potential date." -Charmaine R.


"Your service is more than perfect. It is a blessing. Thank you for the very hard work that you do." -Richard B.


"Truthfinder is a very accurate updated system. Their information is proper. And can be very helpful too." -Juan M.









Notice
This site contains REAL police records (court records of driving citations, speeding tickets, felonies, misdemeanors, sexual offenses, mugshots, etc.), background reports, photos, court documents, address information, phone numbers, and much more. Please BE CAREFUL when conducting a search and ensure all the information you enter is accurate.
Learning the truth about the history of your family and friends can be shocking, so please be cautious when using this tool.
TruthFinder does not provide consumer reports and is not a consumer reporting agency. We provide a lot of sensitive information that can be used to satisfy your curiosity, protect your family, and find the truth about the people in your life. You may not use our service or the information it provides to make decisions about consumer credit, employers, insurance, tenant screening, or any other purposes that would require FCRA compliance.
I Understand


Help Us Refine Your Results
Select Your Gender



Male



Female

NEXT

Skip






















Background Checks and Public Records Search - Truthfinder








 


















Call Toll Free!  (800) 699-8081



Public Records Search
Social Media, Photos, Police Records, Background Checks, Contact Information and Much More!









START HERE - Try searching a friend, relative, celebrity, yourself, or someone else you might know...



First Name:





Last Name:





City:





State:


All States
Alabama
Alaska
Arizona
Arkansas
California
Colorado
Connecticut
District Of Columbia
Delaware
Florida
Georgia
Hawaii
Idaho
Illinois
Indiana
Iowa
Kansas
Kentucky
Louisiana
Maine
Maryland
Massachusetts
Michigan
Minnesota
Mississippi
Missouri
Montana
Nebraska
Nevada
New Hampshire
New Jersey
New Mexico
New York
North Carolina
North Dakota
Ohio
Oklahoma
Oregon
Pennsylvania
Rhode Island
South Carolina
South Dakota
Tennessee
Texas
Utah
Vermont
Virgin Islands
Virginia
Washington
West Virginia
Wisconsin
Wyoming





This is me
Searching for yourself?




Search





  This secure connection is confirmed




We're Very Popular















What Our Happy Users Are Saying




"TruthFinder.com is freakishly accurate… Really scary how much info is out there." -Zac K.


"You found an old friend for me. Thank you." -Nancy V.


"TruthFinder is an excellent site for finding out about someone." -Sherrie F.


"This site is so wonderful. I found my lost godchildren and their mom. Thank you so much." -Lawrence W.


"This is one way to really know a potential date." -Charmaine R.


"Your service is more than perfect. It is a blessing. Thank you for the very hard work that you do." -Richard B.


"Truthfinder is a very accurate updated system. Their information is proper. And can be very helpful too." -Juan M.









Notice
This site contains REAL police records (court records of driving citations, speeding tickets, felonies, misdemeanors, sexual offenses, mugshots, etc.), background reports, photos, court documents, address information, phone numbers, and much more. Please BE CAREFUL when conducting a search and ensure all the information you enter is accurate.
Learning the truth about the history of your family and friends can be shocking, so please be cautious when using this tool.
TruthFinder does not provide consumer reports and is not a consumer reporting agency. We provide a lot of sensitive information that can be used to satisfy your curiosity, protect your family, and find the truth about the people in your life. You may not use our service or the information it provides to make decisions about consumer credit, employers, insurance, tenant screening, or any other purposes that would require FCRA compliance.
I Understand


Help Us Refine Your Results
Select Your Gender



Male



Female

NEXT

Skip






















Background Checks and Public Records Search - Truthfinder








 


















Call Toll Free!  (800) 699-8081



Public Records Search
Social Media, Photos, Police Records, Background Checks, Contact Information and Much More!









START HERE - Try searching a friend, relative, celebrity, yourself, or someone else you might know...




First Name:





Last Name:





City:





State:


All States
Alabama
Alaska
Arizona
Arkansas
California
Colorado
Connecticut
District Of Columbia
Delaware
Florida
Georgia
Hawaii
Idaho
Illinois
Indiana
Iowa
Kansas
Kentucky
Louisiana
Maine
Maryland
Massachusetts
Michigan
Minnesota
Mississippi
Missouri
Montana
Nebraska
Nevada
New Hampshire
New Jersey
New Mexico
New York
North Carolina
North Dakota
Ohio
Oklahoma
Oregon
Pennsylvania
Rhode Island
South Carolina
South Dakota
Tennessee
Texas
Utah
Vermont
Virgin Islands
Virginia
Washington
West Virginia
Wisconsin
Wyoming





check for social media accounts:




















This is me
Searching for yourself?




Search






  This secure connection is confirmed




We're Very Popular















What Our Happy Users Are Saying




"TruthFinder.com is freakishly accurate… Really scary how much info is out there." -Zac K.


"You found an old friend for me. Thank you." -Nancy V.


"TruthFinder is an excellent site for finding out about someone." -Sherrie F.


"This site is so wonderful. I found my lost godchildren and their mom. Thank you so much." -Lawrence W.


"This is one way to really know a potential date." -Charmaine R.


"Your service is more than perfect. It is a blessing. Thank you for the very hard work that you do." -Richard B.


"Truthfinder is a very accurate updated system. Their information is proper. And can be very helpful too." -Juan M.









Notice
This site contains REAL police records (court records of driving citations, speeding tickets, felonies, misdemeanors, sexual offenses, mugshots, etc.), background reports, photos, court documents, address information, phone numbers, and much more. Please BE CAREFUL when conducting a search and ensure all the information you enter is accurate.
Learning the truth about the history of your family and friends can be shocking, so please be cautious when using this tool.
TruthFinder does not provide consumer reports and is not a consumer reporting agency. We provide a lot of sensitive information that can be used to satisfy your curiosity, protect your family, and find the truth about the people in your life. You may not use our service or the information it provides to make decisions about consumer credit, employers, insurance, tenant screening, or any other purposes that would require FCRA compliance.
I Understand


Help Us Refine Your Results
Select Your Gender



Male



Female

NEXT

Skip
















